 




Exxon Mobil Fined for Violating Sanctions on Russia - The New York Times







































































































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation
View mobile version




The New York Times





Politics|Exxon Mobil Fined for Violating Sanctions on Russia







Search

Subscribe Now
Log In


0
Settings




Close search



https://nyti.ms/2tj3W2l








Advertisement








Supported by



Politics

Exxon Mobil Fined for Violating Sanctions on Russia

By ALAN RAPPEPORTJULY 20, 2017



Continue reading the main story
Share This Page

Continue reading the main story












Photo






Rex W. Tillerson, the secretary of state, at the White House in June. When he was Exxon Mobil’s chief executive, the company’s subsidiaries violated United States sanctions by doing business with individuals whose assets were blocked, the Treasury Department said.

Credit
            Doug Mills/The New York Times        



WASHINGTON — The Treasury Department on Thursday fined Exxon Mobil $2 million for violating sanctions that the United States imposed on Russia in 2014 while Rex W. Tillerson, now the secretary of state, was the oil company’s chief executive.The penalty was relatively small for the Treasury and a blip on Exxon’s mammoth balance sheet, but it came as controversy over Russia policy has engulfed Washington. The Trump administration is facing questions about Russia’s intervention in the 2016 election, and Congress has considered stiffening sanctions out of concern that President Trump will try to ease those already in place.The move also underscores concerns over Mr. Tillerson’s deep business connections in Russia.“Exxon Mobil demonstrated reckless disregard for U.S. sanctions requirements,” the Treasury said in a report announcing the penalty. “Exxon Mobil caused significant harm to the Ukraine-related sanctions program.”Hal Eren, a former official in Treasury’s Office of Foreign Assets Control, said the fine showed that the department’s staff members would not be cowed.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

“It gives the message that they’re going to do what they have to even though Rex Tillerson is secretary of state,” he said. “Perhaps it was a bit of assertion of independence by the staff of O.F.A.C.” Continue reading the main story







Advertisement

Continue reading the main story





Exxon violated sanctions imposed after Russia’s armed actions against Ukraine when presidents of the company’s American subsidiaries did business with individuals whose assets were blocked, according to the foreign assets control unit. The violations involved the signing of legal documents related to oil and gas projects in Russia with Igor Sechin, the head of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and another person.Mr. Tillerson had personal business dealings with Mr. Sechin. In 2013, Mr. Tillerson was awarded the Russian government’s Order of Friendship after he signed deals with Rosneft that opened the Kara Sea in the Arctic to oil drilling.Mr. Tillerson was the only American official  to join Mr. Trump at a meeting with President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia at the Group of 20 summit meeting in Germany this month.Relations between the United States and Russia have been strained by the allegations of election meddling and by the subsequent inquiries into Mr. Trump’s campaign. The president has signaled a continuing desire to improve relations, and he recently praised the brokering of a cease-fire in part of Syria as the fruit of his rapport with Mr. Putin.
Newsletter Sign Up
Continue reading the main story

  


Please verify you're not a robot by clicking the box.
Invalid email address. Please re-enter.
You must select a newsletter to subscribe to.



Sign Up







You agree to receive occasional updates and special offers for The New York Times's products and services.





Thank you for subscribing.
An error has occurred. Please try again later.
You are already subscribed to this email.
View all New York Times newsletters.


See Sample
Manage Email Preferences
Not you?
Privacy Policy
Opt out or contact us anytime




American and European sanctions were imposed on Russia in March 2014 after Moscow annexed Crimea from Ukraine. Even as the crisis in Ukraine deepened, Exxon continued to press for deeper involvement in Russia’s oil industry.Mr. Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions, before they were tightened in late 2014. At Exxon’s annual meeting in 2014, he said, “We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don’t find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively, and that’s a very hard thing to do.”The State Department declined to comment on the penalty and referred questions to Exxon.In a statement, Exxon called the penalty “fundamentally unfair.” The company also filed a lawsuit against the Treasury challenging the fine.The company said it had adhered to guidance from the White House and the Treasury, and that its representatives had done nothing wrong by signing documents related to active business with Rosneft, which was not blocked by sanctions. Mr. Sechin was acting in an official capacity, Exxon said, not a personal one.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

In its suit, Exxon argues that the Treasury penalty is out of sync with the guidance that the department and the White House provided when the sanctions were announced. The company also notes that BP’s American chief executive was allowed to participate in Rosneft board meetings with Mr. Sechin so long as the activity involved Rosneft business and not Mr. Sechin’s personal business.A Treasury official said the penalty came after a multiyear investigation.It was not the first time in recent months that Exxon has drawn attention for its handling of the Russia sanctions. In April, the company asked the Treasury for a waiver from sanctions against Russia so it could drill in the Black Sea in a venture with Rosneft, stirring speculation that Exxon hoped to influence the administration through its ties to Mr. Tillerson. That request was denied.

There were signs on Thursday that the penalty could energize the push in Congress for tougher sanctions against Russia.“I am disappointed that an American company would so clearly act in divergence from U.S. national security interests,” said Senator Ben Cardin, a Maryland Democrat. “Today’s news only underscores the urgency for new sanctions on Russia that increase pressure on the country and tighten loopholes in existing sanctions.”
Continue reading the main story






We’re interested in your feedback on this page. Tell us what you think.





























What's Next


Loading...









Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times
























                         Why is Rex Tillerson running the State Department? - The Washington Post                                                                         2         Desktop notifications are on   | Turn off                    Subscribe       Account Profile Newsletters & Alerts Gift Subscriptions Contact Us Help Desk              Accessibility for screenreader                Share on Facebook  Share on Twitter  Share on Google Plus  Share via Email  Share on LinkedIn  Share on Pinterest  Share on Tumblr           Resize Text Print Article  Comments80+             The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                                   PostEverything   Perspective     Perspective  Interpretation of the news based on evidence, including data, as well as anticipating how events might unfold based on past events       Why is Rex Tillerson running the State Department?               The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                  By Daniel W. Drezner  By Daniel W. Drezner  July 20 Follow @dandrezner   Daniel W. Drezner is a professor of international politics at the Fletcher School of Law and Diplomacy at Tufts University and a regular contributor to PostEverything.      Secretary of State Rex Tillerson arrives before President Trump speaks at a dinner with Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi in the Blue Room of the White House on Monday, June 26, 2017. (Photo by Jabin Botsford/The Washington Post)  If you teach international relations, you quickly develop an aversion to black-and-white thinking. You become comfortable in all of the shades of gray. That’s because, in foreign affairs, there is rarely an obvious right call and an obvious wrong call. In most situations, the people who have to run foreign policy face difficult trade-offs. They have to make tough decisions, whereas all I have to do is sit in the peanut gallery and crack wise. I bring this up because, every once in a while, I look at what I have written about Secretary of State Rex Tillerson and worry that I’ve abandoned all those shades of gray. Consider  a sampling of headlines from pieces focusing on him since January:  “Where in the World Is Secretary of State Rex Tillerson?“ “The Dangerous Trajectory of Rex Tillerson’s Tenure“ “The Beclowning of the Executive Branch“ “I Was Wrong About Rex Tillerson” (an attempt at sarcasm) “Some Pro Bono Management Advice for Rex Tillerson“ “The Vulgar Realism of Rex Tillerson’s State Department“ “I Can’t Stop Laughing at the Trump Administration. That’s Not a Good Thing.“ “My So-Called Secretary of State“  Just scanning these headlines, the academic in me thinks I am being too harsh on Tillerson. True, it would seem that Tillerson has been a bad secretary of state. True, it seems as though America’s influence in the world has been ebbing throughout 2017, with the United States retreating from places as diverse as Syria and Burma and the hearts and minds of Europeans. True, Tillerson has advised Trump so badly that the president keeps getting played on every high-profile foreign visit. Surely, however, there must be some rational explanation for why Tillerson is doing what he’s doing, right? Last week Tillerson did provide a small window of his thinking to reporters after a failed effort at Middle East shuttle diplomacy. According to the Los Angeles Times’s Tracy Wilkinson: “Well it is a lot different than being CEO of Exxon because I was the ultimate decision-maker,” Secretary of State Rex Tillerson said Thursday in unusually candid comments to reporters…. In his comments aboard his flight home, Tillerson said he did not mean to criticize the U.S. government but that, on a whole, “it’s largely not a highly disciplined organization.” “Decision-making is fragmented, and sometimes people don’t want to take decisions. Coordination is difficult through the interagency [process].” This is the stereotypical lament among the private-sector individuals who enter the public sector. And it’s true, crafting foreign policy requires cooperation among a decentralized batch of semi-feudal bureaucracies. So I get his frustrations in that area, even though anyone who knows anything about foreign policy could have told him that this is the life. The thing is, Tillerson is at the apex of the State Department hierarchy. He should be able to run Foggy Bottom similar to how he ran Exxon. But the steps he has taken this past week make no sense. Consider three stories about the State Department in the last week: 1. Colum Lynch, “Tillerson to Shutter State Department War Crimes Office,” Foreign Policy. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson is downgrading the U.S. campaign against mass atrocities, shuttering the Foggy Bottom office that worked for two decades to hold war criminals accountable, according to several former U.S. officials…. The decision to close the office comes at a time when America’s top diplomat has been seeking to reorganize the State Department to concentrate on what he sees as key priorities: pursuing economic opportunities for American businesses and strengthening U.S. military prowess. Those changes are coming at the expense of programs that promote human rights and fight world poverty, which have been targeted for steep budget cuts. “There’s no mistaking it — this move will be a huge loss for accountability,” said Richard Dicker, the director of Human Rights Watch’s international justice program. The war crimes ambassador’s “organizational independence gave the office much more weight,” he added. 2. Nick Wadhams and Nafeesa Syeed, “Tillerson to Shut Cyber Office in State Department Reorganization,” Bloomberg. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson is shutting down an office that coordinates cyber issues with other countries, according to two people familiar with the plan, in a move that critics said will diminish the U.S. voice in confronting hackers. The Office of the Coordinator for Cyber Issues, established under President Barack Obama in 2011, will be folded into the State Department’s Bureau of Economic and Business Affairs, according to the people, who asked not to be identified in advance of an announcement. The coordinator will no longer report directly to the secretary of state, going instead through the bureau’s chain of command as Tillerson pushes ahead with a department-wide reorganization, they said. “It’s taking an issue that’s preeminent and putting it inside a backwater within the State Department,” said Robert Knake, a senior fellow for cybersecurity at the Council on Foreign Relations in Washington who was director of cybersecurity policy at the National Security Council under Obama. “Position to power matters both within the U.S. government and within the international community.” 3. Bethany Allen-Ebrahimian and Robbie Gramer, “State Department Suspends Yet Another Fellowship Program,” Foreign Policy. The State Department has suspended a program that fast-tracks top recruits, sparking outrage from students and graduates who planned on joining the diplomatic corps. The Diplomacy Fellows Program (DFP), established as part of then-Secretary of State Colin Powell’s Diplomatic Readiness Initiative in the early 2000’s, allows recipients of several prestigious fellowship programs to fast track their applications to the elite Foreign Service branch — a notoriously long-winded process layered in bureaucratic red tape. Critics fear it could choke out the next generation of talented diplomats, particularly while scores of senior foreign service officers are poised to retire and Foggy Bottom grapples with hemorrhaging talent amid morale problems and steep budget cut proposals. “The U.S. government has spent hundreds of thousands of taxpayer dollars to train us,” said one graduate student affected by the suspension who requested anonymity due to the sensitive of the application process. “And they’re going to lose out. Because the most talented people are going to find something else to do.” It’s that last quote that truly boggles the mind. Surely, as CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson had to know the value of being able to recruit top-tier personnel. It is already difficult to recruit top people for the public sector when their salaries languish compared to the private sector. To quash the pipelines of human capital into the State Department is straight out of Dumb Management 101. Is it debatable whether Tillerson meets the classic criteria of a secretary of state, but there is no disputing that he is the CEO of the State Department. What, however, is he trying to do as the head of it? How is he making it a better organization? Does he understand how the secretary of state exercises influence in the world? Every single step he has taken appears to weaken and undermine the very department he heads. I simply do not understand why he is in charge of the State Department. I miss the color gray, and so sometimes I worry that I am being too harsh on Tillerson’s management of the State Department. Increasingly, however, I worry that I am not being harsh enough.          80+  Comments           Share on FacebookShare       Share on TwitterTweet     Share via Email                  Daniel W. Drezner is a professor of international politics at the Fletcher School of Law and Diplomacy at Tufts University and a regular contributor to PostEverything.  Follow @dandrezner           80  Show Comments       Discussion Policy     Comments       SuperFan Badge SuperFan badge holders consistently post smart, timely comments about Washington area sports and teams. More about badges | Request a badge   Culture Connoisseur Badge Culture Connoisseurs consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on the arts, lifestyle and entertainment. More about badges | Request a badge   Fact Checker Badge Fact Checkers contribute questions, information and facts to The Fact Checker. More about badges | Request a badge   Washingtologist Badge Washingtologists consistently post thought-provoking, timely comments on events, communities, and trends in the Washington area. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Writer Badge This commenter is a Washington Post editor, reporter or producer.   Post Forum Badge Post Forum members consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on politics, national and international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Weather Watcher Badge Weather Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on climates and forecasts. More about badges | Request a badge   World Watcher Badge World Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Contributor Badge This commenter is a Washington Post contributor. Post contributors aren’t staff, but may write articles or columns. In some cases, contributors are sources or experts quoted in a story. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Recommended Washington Post reporters or editors recommend this comment or reader post.   You must be logged in to report a comment. Sign in here   You must be logged in to recommend a comment. Sign in here   Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.All comments are posted in the All Comments tab. More about badgesGet a badge  To pause and restart automatic updates, click "Live" or "Paused". If paused, you'll be notified of the number of additional comments that have come in.    Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.          Spam Offensive Disagree Off-Topic        Among the criteria for featured comments: likes by users, replies by users, previous history of valuable commenting, and selection by moderators.                 Facebook  Twitter  Reddit     StumbleUpon  Digg                         Most Read        1   Trump’s new team offers muddled messages on sanctions, pardons       2   9 people dead after at least 39 were found packed in a sweltering tractor-trailer in San Antonio       3   Republicans are in full control of government — but losing control of their party       4    Review  ‘Game of Thrones’ recap: In ‘Stormborn,’ the battle for the Seven Kingdoms truly begins       5   Kushner to face intel committee on Monday behind closed doors            The story must be told. Subscribe to The Washington Post.   Subscribe          washingtonpost.com © 1996-2017 The Washington Post   Help and Contact Us Terms of Service Privacy Policy Print Products Terms of Sale Digital Products Terms of Sale Submissions and Discussion Policy RSS Terms of Service Ad Choices                                                                                     Why is Rex Tillerson running the State Department? - The Washington Post                                                                         2         Desktop notifications are on   | Turn off                    Subscribe       Account Profile Newsletters & Alerts Gift Subscriptions Contact Us Help Desk              Accessibility for screenreader                Share on Facebook  Share on Twitter  Share on Google Plus  Share via Email  Share on LinkedIn  Share on Pinterest  Share on Tumblr           Resize Text Print Article  Comments80+             The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                                   PostEverything   Perspective     Perspective  Interpretation of the news based on evidence, including data, as well as anticipating how events might unfold based on past events       Why is Rex Tillerson running the State Department?               The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                  By Daniel W. Drezner  By Daniel W. Drezner  July 20 Follow @dandrezner   Daniel W. Drezner is a professor of international politics at the Fletcher School of Law and Diplomacy at Tufts University and a regular contributor to PostEverything.      Secretary of State Rex Tillerson arrives before President Trump speaks at a dinner with Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi in the Blue Room of the White House on Monday, June 26, 2017. (Photo by Jabin Botsford/The Washington Post)  If you teach international relations, you quickly develop an aversion to black-and-white thinking. You become comfortable in all of the shades of gray. That’s because, in foreign affairs, there is rarely an obvious right call and an obvious wrong call. In most situations, the people who have to run foreign policy face difficult trade-offs. They have to make tough decisions, whereas all I have to do is sit in the peanut gallery and crack wise. I bring this up because, every once in a while, I look at what I have written about Secretary of State Rex Tillerson and worry that I’ve abandoned all those shades of gray. Consider  a sampling of headlines from pieces focusing on him since January:  “Where in the World Is Secretary of State Rex Tillerson?“ “The Dangerous Trajectory of Rex Tillerson’s Tenure“ “The Beclowning of the Executive Branch“ “I Was Wrong About Rex Tillerson” (an attempt at sarcasm) “Some Pro Bono Management Advice for Rex Tillerson“ “The Vulgar Realism of Rex Tillerson’s State Department“ “I Can’t Stop Laughing at the Trump Administration. That’s Not a Good Thing.“ “My So-Called Secretary of State“  Just scanning these headlines, the academic in me thinks I am being too harsh on Tillerson. True, it would seem that Tillerson has been a bad secretary of state. True, it seems as though America’s influence in the world has been ebbing throughout 2017, with the United States retreating from places as diverse as Syria and Burma and the hearts and minds of Europeans. True, Tillerson has advised Trump so badly that the president keeps getting played on every high-profile foreign visit. Surely, however, there must be some rational explanation for why Tillerson is doing what he’s doing, right? Last week Tillerson did provide a small window of his thinking to reporters after a failed effort at Middle East shuttle diplomacy. According to the Los Angeles Times’s Tracy Wilkinson: “Well it is a lot different than being CEO of Exxon because I was the ultimate decision-maker,” Secretary of State Rex Tillerson said Thursday in unusually candid comments to reporters…. In his comments aboard his flight home, Tillerson said he did not mean to criticize the U.S. government but that, on a whole, “it’s largely not a highly disciplined organization.” “Decision-making is fragmented, and sometimes people don’t want to take decisions. Coordination is difficult through the interagency [process].” This is the stereotypical lament among the private-sector individuals who enter the public sector. And it’s true, crafting foreign policy requires cooperation among a decentralized batch of semi-feudal bureaucracies. So I get his frustrations in that area, even though anyone who knows anything about foreign policy could have told him that this is the life. The thing is, Tillerson is at the apex of the State Department hierarchy. He should be able to run Foggy Bottom similar to how he ran Exxon. But the steps he has taken this past week make no sense. Consider three stories about the State Department in the last week: 1. Colum Lynch, “Tillerson to Shutter State Department War Crimes Office,” Foreign Policy. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson is downgrading the U.S. campaign against mass atrocities, shuttering the Foggy Bottom office that worked for two decades to hold war criminals accountable, according to several former U.S. officials…. The decision to close the office comes at a time when America’s top diplomat has been seeking to reorganize the State Department to concentrate on what he sees as key priorities: pursuing economic opportunities for American businesses and strengthening U.S. military prowess. Those changes are coming at the expense of programs that promote human rights and fight world poverty, which have been targeted for steep budget cuts. “There’s no mistaking it — this move will be a huge loss for accountability,” said Richard Dicker, the director of Human Rights Watch’s international justice program. The war crimes ambassador’s “organizational independence gave the office much more weight,” he added. 2. Nick Wadhams and Nafeesa Syeed, “Tillerson to Shut Cyber Office in State Department Reorganization,” Bloomberg. Secretary of State Rex Tillerson is shutting down an office that coordinates cyber issues with other countries, according to two people familiar with the plan, in a move that critics said will diminish the U.S. voice in confronting hackers. The Office of the Coordinator for Cyber Issues, established under President Barack Obama in 2011, will be folded into the State Department’s Bureau of Economic and Business Affairs, according to the people, who asked not to be identified in advance of an announcement. The coordinator will no longer report directly to the secretary of state, going instead through the bureau’s chain of command as Tillerson pushes ahead with a department-wide reorganization, they said. “It’s taking an issue that’s preeminent and putting it inside a backwater within the State Department,” said Robert Knake, a senior fellow for cybersecurity at the Council on Foreign Relations in Washington who was director of cybersecurity policy at the National Security Council under Obama. “Position to power matters both within the U.S. government and within the international community.” 3. Bethany Allen-Ebrahimian and Robbie Gramer, “State Department Suspends Yet Another Fellowship Program,” Foreign Policy. The State Department has suspended a program that fast-tracks top recruits, sparking outrage from students and graduates who planned on joining the diplomatic corps. The Diplomacy Fellows Program (DFP), established as part of then-Secretary of State Colin Powell’s Diplomatic Readiness Initiative in the early 2000’s, allows recipients of several prestigious fellowship programs to fast track their applications to the elite Foreign Service branch — a notoriously long-winded process layered in bureaucratic red tape. Critics fear it could choke out the next generation of talented diplomats, particularly while scores of senior foreign service officers are poised to retire and Foggy Bottom grapples with hemorrhaging talent amid morale problems and steep budget cut proposals. “The U.S. government has spent hundreds of thousands of taxpayer dollars to train us,” said one graduate student affected by the suspension who requested anonymity due to the sensitive of the application process. “And they’re going to lose out. Because the most talented people are going to find something else to do.” It’s that last quote that truly boggles the mind. Surely, as CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson had to know the value of being able to recruit top-tier personnel. It is already difficult to recruit top people for the public sector when their salaries languish compared to the private sector. To quash the pipelines of human capital into the State Department is straight out of Dumb Management 101. Is it debatable whether Tillerson meets the classic criteria of a secretary of state, but there is no disputing that he is the CEO of the State Department. What, however, is he trying to do as the head of it? How is he making it a better organization? Does he understand how the secretary of state exercises influence in the world? Every single step he has taken appears to weaken and undermine the very department he heads. I simply do not understand why he is in charge of the State Department. I miss the color gray, and so sometimes I worry that I am being too harsh on Tillerson’s management of the State Department. Increasingly, however, I worry that I am not being harsh enough.          80+  Comments           Share on FacebookShare       Share on TwitterTweet     Share via Email                  Daniel W. Drezner is a professor of international politics at the Fletcher School of Law and Diplomacy at Tufts University and a regular contributor to PostEverything.  Follow @dandrezner           80  Show Comments       Discussion Policy     Comments       SuperFan Badge SuperFan badge holders consistently post smart, timely comments about Washington area sports and teams. More about badges | Request a badge   Culture Connoisseur Badge Culture Connoisseurs consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on the arts, lifestyle and entertainment. More about badges | Request a badge   Fact Checker Badge Fact Checkers contribute questions, information and facts to The Fact Checker. More about badges | Request a badge   Washingtologist Badge Washingtologists consistently post thought-provoking, timely comments on events, communities, and trends in the Washington area. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Writer Badge This commenter is a Washington Post editor, reporter or producer.   Post Forum Badge Post Forum members consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on politics, national and international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Weather Watcher Badge Weather Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on climates and forecasts. More about badges | Request a badge   World Watcher Badge World Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Contributor Badge This commenter is a Washington Post contributor. Post contributors aren’t staff, but may write articles or columns. In some cases, contributors are sources or experts quoted in a story. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Recommended Washington Post reporters or editors recommend this comment or reader post.   You must be logged in to report a comment. Sign in here   You must be logged in to recommend a comment. Sign in here   Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.All comments are posted in the All Comments tab. More about badgesGet a badge  To pause and restart automatic updates, click "Live" or "Paused". If paused, you'll be notified of the number of additional comments that have come in.    Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.          Spam Offensive Disagree Off-Topic        Among the criteria for featured comments: likes by users, replies by users, previous history of valuable commenting, and selection by moderators.                 Facebook  Twitter  Reddit     StumbleUpon  Digg                         Most Read        1   Trump’s new team offers muddled messages on sanctions, pardons       2   9 people dead after at least 39 were found packed in a sweltering tractor-trailer in San Antonio       3   Republicans are in full control of government — but losing control of their party       4    Review  ‘Game of Thrones’ recap: In ‘Stormborn,’ the battle for the Seven Kingdoms truly begins       5   Kushner to face intel committee on Monday behind closed doors            The story must be told. Subscribe to The Washington Post.   Subscribe          washingtonpost.com © 1996-2017 The Washington Post   Help and Contact Us Terms of Service Privacy Policy Print Products Terms of Sale Digital Products Terms of Sale Submissions and Discussion Policy RSS Terms of Service Ad Choices                                                            




























































Rex Tillerson Gets His First Test on the Road - Bloomberg





























































  
















Politics
Rex Tillerson Gets His First Test on the Road


                    The secretary of state rolls up his sleeves to deal with the Qatar crisis.

                

By Nick Wadhams
        
@nwadhams
More stories by Nick Wadhams





July 13, 2017, 12:01 AM EDT















Qatari officials greet Tillerson as he arrives in Doha on July 11. 

Photograph: Qatar News Agency via AP Photo



At the start of the Group of 20 summit in Hamburg, Secretary of State Rex Tillerson showed a rare flash of impatience during a meeting with Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov. As Lavrov started complaining about the loss of a reserved parking space outside the ambassador’s residence in Washington, D.C., Tillerson cut him off. “We’re going down here, Sergei,” Tillerson said, making a swirling down-the-drain motion with his hand, according to two people who were in the meeting. His point: He wasn’t there to talk about petty grievances.Tillerson suggested that his boss, President Donald Trump, take an equally direct approach in his sitdown with Russian President Vladimir Putin a few hours later. Trump did so and began the meeting by raising the issue of Russia’s election meddling, according to a senior Department of State official familiar with the meeting. Putin and Trump spent the next 45 minutes discussing the elections and cyber­security, the official says.Tillerson’s performance in Hamburg suggests he’s finally starting to hit his stride as secretary of state after a rocky start in the job. The former chief executive of Exxon Mobil Corp. has spent the past few months cloistered away from State Department staff, fighting with the White House over hiring decisions, and weathering criticism that he’d been sidelined by Trump. None of that’s gone away, but Tillerson’s decision to embark on a series of hops through the Persian Gulf—his first attempt at shuttle diplomacy—is the strongest evidence yet that he’s embracing his role as traveling problem-solver.








During a whirlwind eight-day trip that included stops in Kuwait, Qatar, and Saudi Arabia, Tillerson sought to help Kuwaiti mediators broker a deal to end a standoff between two key U.S. allies in the region, Saudi Arabia and Qatar, which a Saudi-led coalition accuses of financing terrorism. The crisis fits Tillerson’s résumé perfectly. He knows the region, and he knows the players. Exxon’s ties to Qatar go back to the early 1990s, when Mobil helped develop the country’s gigantic North Field gas reserves. “Nice to be back in Doha, a very familiar place,” Tillerson said when he landed in the Qatari capital and met the emir, Tamim bin Hamad Al Thani, on July 11. “This is a good place for him to cut his teeth,” says Daniel Kurtzer, a U.S. ambassador to Egypt and Israel under George W. Bush who’s now a professor at Princeton, “given that he’s dealing with oil and gas producers—people who speak a language he speaks.”The Qatar crisis could give Tillerson his first big win as America’s top diplomat. He could certainly use one. Despite his repeated warnings, North Korea has pressed ahead with development of nuclear weapons and ballistic missiles. Tillerson’s efforts to get China to exert more pressure on the country have been fruitless. And then there’s Russia, which continues to defy sanctions. “The stakes are huge for Tillerson,” says Derek Chollet, a former Obama administration official who’s a senior adviser at the German Marshall Fund of the U.S. “If he can’t make a difference on this issue, it is hard to see him succeeding anywhere.”Tillerson achieved tangible progress within hours of arriving in Doha, when he announced the signing of a memorandum with Qatar that will coordinate ways to address the financing of terror. The true test will be whether this mollifies Saudi Arabia, inclining it to back down.







                        The most important business stories of the day.
                    

                        Get Bloomberg's daily newsletter.
                    





                                    Sign Up
                            










Tillerson’s attempts to carve out a role as the voice of U.S. foreign policy have been most evident on this trip. In Hamburg, according to a State official, when Trump was questioned about the Qatar crisis, he repeatedly responded that Tillerson was handling it. Yet Tillerson still has to fight against the perception that he’s on the outside looking in, particularly when Trump steps on his message with an impulsive tweet, as he did during the early days of the Qatar crisis, siding with the Saudis even as he offered Tillerson up as a mediator. “I don’t know anyone in the Gulf—or anyone in the world—who believes you go to Tillerson or the State Department for decisions in the Trump administration,” Chollet says. “No one really knows if the president has his back.”As much as the trip has shown that Tillerson has come into the job, it’s also provided hints about how much he misses his past life. During a brief stop in Istanbul, he found time to accept an award from the World Petroleum Congress that had been bestowed on him before he became secretary of state. Rather than using it as a chance to talk about U.S. energy policy, Tillerson delivered a brief speech that struck a wistful tone. “I miss all of you,” he said. “I missed you as colleagues. I miss you as partners. I miss you as competitors.” —With Nafeesa Syeed


BOTTOM LINE - 
After a rocky start as secretary of state, Tillerson is facing a key test with his efforts to broker a deal between Qatar and Saudi Arabia.



Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.

LEARN MORE











July 17, 2017

Subscribe
Reprints









Most Read


Japan Captures More Photographs of Likely Melted Fukushima Fuel


Japan Pictures Likely Show Melted Fukushima Fuel for First Time


Singapore Startup Takes Bitcoin Into Real World With Visa


Shootout in Cancun: Narcos Take Their War Into Hot Beach Resorts


IMF Sees U.S. Fading as Global Growth Engine










































































































Rex Tillerson Gets His First Test on the Road - Bloomberg





























































  
















Politics
Rex Tillerson Gets His First Test on the Road


                    The secretary of state rolls up his sleeves to deal with the Qatar crisis.

                

By Nick Wadhams
        
@nwadhams
More stories by Nick Wadhams





July 13, 2017, 12:01 AM EDT















Qatari officials greet Tillerson as he arrives in Doha on July 11. 

Photograph: Qatar News Agency via AP Photo



At the start of the Group of 20 summit in Hamburg, Secretary of State Rex Tillerson showed a rare flash of impatience during a meeting with Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov. As Lavrov started complaining about the loss of a reserved parking space outside the ambassador’s residence in Washington, D.C., Tillerson cut him off. “We’re going down here, Sergei,” Tillerson said, making a swirling down-the-drain motion with his hand, according to two people who were in the meeting. His point: He wasn’t there to talk about petty grievances.Tillerson suggested that his boss, President Donald Trump, take an equally direct approach in his sitdown with Russian President Vladimir Putin a few hours later. Trump did so and began the meeting by raising the issue of Russia’s election meddling, according to a senior Department of State official familiar with the meeting. Putin and Trump spent the next 45 minutes discussing the elections and cyber­security, the official says.Tillerson’s performance in Hamburg suggests he’s finally starting to hit his stride as secretary of state after a rocky start in the job. The former chief executive of Exxon Mobil Corp. has spent the past few months cloistered away from State Department staff, fighting with the White House over hiring decisions, and weathering criticism that he’d been sidelined by Trump. None of that’s gone away, but Tillerson’s decision to embark on a series of hops through the Persian Gulf—his first attempt at shuttle diplomacy—is the strongest evidence yet that he’s embracing his role as traveling problem-solver.








During a whirlwind eight-day trip that included stops in Kuwait, Qatar, and Saudi Arabia, Tillerson sought to help Kuwaiti mediators broker a deal to end a standoff between two key U.S. allies in the region, Saudi Arabia and Qatar, which a Saudi-led coalition accuses of financing terrorism. The crisis fits Tillerson’s résumé perfectly. He knows the region, and he knows the players. Exxon’s ties to Qatar go back to the early 1990s, when Mobil helped develop the country’s gigantic North Field gas reserves. “Nice to be back in Doha, a very familiar place,” Tillerson said when he landed in the Qatari capital and met the emir, Tamim bin Hamad Al Thani, on July 11. “This is a good place for him to cut his teeth,” says Daniel Kurtzer, a U.S. ambassador to Egypt and Israel under George W. Bush who’s now a professor at Princeton, “given that he’s dealing with oil and gas producers—people who speak a language he speaks.”The Qatar crisis could give Tillerson his first big win as America’s top diplomat. He could certainly use one. Despite his repeated warnings, North Korea has pressed ahead with development of nuclear weapons and ballistic missiles. Tillerson’s efforts to get China to exert more pressure on the country have been fruitless. And then there’s Russia, which continues to defy sanctions. “The stakes are huge for Tillerson,” says Derek Chollet, a former Obama administration official who’s a senior adviser at the German Marshall Fund of the U.S. “If he can’t make a difference on this issue, it is hard to see him succeeding anywhere.”Tillerson achieved tangible progress within hours of arriving in Doha, when he announced the signing of a memorandum with Qatar that will coordinate ways to address the financing of terror. The true test will be whether this mollifies Saudi Arabia, inclining it to back down.







                        The most important business stories of the day.
                    

                        Get Bloomberg's daily newsletter.
                    





                                    Sign Up
                            










Tillerson’s attempts to carve out a role as the voice of U.S. foreign policy have been most evident on this trip. In Hamburg, according to a State official, when Trump was questioned about the Qatar crisis, he repeatedly responded that Tillerson was handling it. Yet Tillerson still has to fight against the perception that he’s on the outside looking in, particularly when Trump steps on his message with an impulsive tweet, as he did during the early days of the Qatar crisis, siding with the Saudis even as he offered Tillerson up as a mediator. “I don’t know anyone in the Gulf—or anyone in the world—who believes you go to Tillerson or the State Department for decisions in the Trump administration,” Chollet says. “No one really knows if the president has his back.”As much as the trip has shown that Tillerson has come into the job, it’s also provided hints about how much he misses his past life. During a brief stop in Istanbul, he found time to accept an award from the World Petroleum Congress that had been bestowed on him before he became secretary of state. Rather than using it as a chance to talk about U.S. energy policy, Tillerson delivered a brief speech that struck a wistful tone. “I miss all of you,” he said. “I missed you as colleagues. I miss you as partners. I miss you as competitors.” —With Nafeesa Syeed


BOTTOM LINE - 
After a rocky start as secretary of state, Tillerson is facing a key test with his efforts to broker a deal between Qatar and Saudi Arabia.



Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.

LEARN MORE











July 17, 2017

Subscribe
Reprints









Most Read


Japan Captures More Photographs of Likely Melted Fukushima Fuel


Japan Pictures Likely Show Melted Fukushima Fuel for First Time


Singapore Startup Takes Bitcoin Into Real World With Visa


Shootout in Cancun: Narcos Take Their War Into Hot Beach Resorts


IMF Sees U.S. Fading as Global Growth Engine













































 

ADL Delivers Signatures Calling on Rex Tillerson to Appoint Anti-Semitism Envoy











































































 








Home
Submit Post
RINF Reports
Login
Register
About

About RINF
Topics
TV Show
Privacy Policy
Contact


 


 








Search
















                Monday, July 24, 2017
            

Home
Submit Post
RINF Reports




 

The Russia Investigation is Distracting Us from These Two Key Issues 




 

Codex Alimentarius and Monsanto’s Toxic Relations 




 

Auguries of Innocence & Navel-Gazing 




 

Russiagate Exposed: It’s a Fraud 




 

In India, National Academy of Agricultural Sciences Ditches Science for Spin… 

 


Login
Register
About

About RINF
Topics
TV Show
Privacy Policy
Contact









Sign in
Welcome! Log into your account

your username
your password

Forgot your password? Get help
Create an account


Create an account
Welcome! Register for an account

your email
your username

A password will be e-mailed to you.


Password recovery
Recover your password

your email

A password will be e-mailed to you.










RINF Alternative News & Media, Real Independent News & Film




  
 















Home
Submit Post
RINF Reports




 

The Russia Investigation is Distracting Us from These Two Key Issues 




 

Codex Alimentarius and Monsanto’s Toxic Relations 




 

Auguries of Innocence & Navel-Gazing 




 

Russiagate Exposed: It’s a Fraud 




 

In India, National Academy of Agricultural Sciences Ditches Science for Spin… 

 


Login
Register
About

About RINF
Topics
TV Show
Privacy Policy
Contact

























 




Home  Newswire  ADL Delivers Signatures Calling on Rex Tillerson to Appoint Anti-Semitism Envoy






ADL Delivers Signatures Calling on Rex Tillerson to Appoint Anti-Semitism Envoy

By Red Ice -   2 days ago 1 212 




Share on Facebook
Tweet on Twitter






Editor’s note: it is significant that the office of Special Envoy to Monitor and Combat Anti-Semitism has remained vacant during the Trump presidency. It is possible that Trump’s administration is incrementally distancing itself from the Israel Lobby and likeminded organizations.
The Anti-Defamation League (ADL) today delivered to the U.S. State Department thousands of signatures on a petition calling on President Trump and Secretary of State Rex Tillerson to fill the vacant office of Special Envoy to Monitor and Combat Anti-Semitism as quickly as possible.
The envoy position, mandated by the Anti-Semitism Awareness Act signed into law by President George W. Bush in 2004, has remained vacant since the beginning of the Trump administration. Secretary of State Tillerson indicated in testimony before Congress in June that the administration had yet to make a decision about whether the position would be filled at all.
The ADL petition urges Mr. Tillerson to appoint a Special Envoy immediately to continue an office that “has served as an invaluable diplomatic and domestic purpose in fighting anti-Semitism” under Democratic and Republican administrations alike.
“We know firsthand that this role is critical to fighting anti-Semitism and it is vital that the United States continue to manifest its leadership in fighting hate around the world,” said Jonathan A. Greenblatt, ADL CEO. “And we are not alone. Thousands of Americans have signed our petition urging the…

Read more



 


 







NobodysaysBOO



DO SOMETHING for the US middle class CITIZENS not isralie JEWS!
or GIT OUT!











 



  
   Loading...   




 

















News to your inboxStay ahead of the curve.










Yes! Send me daily news!





You have Successfully Subscribed!




Support From Readers 75.73%Help Support RINF

RINF Community Discussion 
SEARCH RINF NEWS 








Archives Archives

Select Month
 July 2017 
 June 2017 
 May 2017 
 April 2017 
 March 2017 
 February 2017 
 January 2017 
 December 2016 
 November 2016 
 October 2016 
 September 2016 
 August 2016 
 July 2016 
 June 2016 
 May 2016 
 April 2016 
 March 2016 
 February 2016 
 January 2016 
 December 2015 
 November 2015 
 October 2015 
 September 2015 
 August 2015 
 July 2015 
 June 2015 
 May 2015 
 April 2015 
 March 2015 
 February 2015 
 January 2015 
 December 2014 
 November 2014 
 October 2014 
 September 2014 
 August 2014 
 July 2014 
 June 2014 
 May 2014 
 April 2014 
 March 2014 
 February 2014 
 January 2014 
 December 2013 
 November 2013 
 October 2013 
 September 2013 
 August 2013 
 July 2013 
 June 2013 
 May 2013 
 April 2013 
 March 2013 
 February 2013 
 January 2013 
 December 2012 
 November 2012 
 October 2012 
 September 2012 
 August 2012 
 July 2012 
 June 2012 
 March 2012 
 February 2012 
 January 2012 
 December 2011 
 November 2011 
 October 2011 
 September 2011 
 August 2011 
 July 2011 
 June 2011 
 May 2011 
 April 2011 
 March 2011 
 February 2011 
 January 2011 
 December 2010 
 November 2010 
 October 2010 
 September 2010 
 August 2010 
 July 2010 
 June 2010 
 May 2010 
 April 2010 
 January 2010 
 December 2009 
 November 2009 
 October 2009 
 September 2009 
 August 2009 
 July 2009 
 June 2009 
 May 2009 
 April 2009 
 March 2009 
 February 2009 
 January 2009 
 December 2008 
 November 2008 
 October 2008 
 September 2008 
 August 2008 
 July 2008 
 June 2008 
 May 2008 
 April 2008 
 March 2008 
 February 2008 
 January 2008 
 December 2007 
 November 2007 
 October 2007 
 September 2007 
 August 2007 
 April 2007 
 March 2007 
 December 2005 
 January 1970 

 

 
 
 











July 2017


M
T
W
T
F
S
S




« Jun
 
 




 12


3456789


10111213141516


17181920212223


24252627282930


31
 


 






































 






Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of Exxon Mobil Corporation | ExxonMobil News Releases


























































 























Login





























 ExxonMobil 

  Menu 


 ExpandEnergy 




Natural gas

 Environment and safety 
 Operations 
 Policy 
 Technology 






Oil

 Environment and safety 
 Policy 
 Technology 







Outlook for Energy

 Highlights 
 Transportation 
 Natural gas 
 Technology 
 Power generation 
 Role of oil 
 Charts 
 Videos 
 Downloads 







Research and development

 Advanced biofuels 
 Approach 
 University collaborations 








 ExpandTechnology 




Carbon capture and storage

 Advanced carbonate fuel cell technology 
 Controlled freeze zone 
 Developing cutting edge technology 



Deepwater drilling

 Environment and safety 
 Technology 






Energy efficiency

 Cogeneration 
 Mitigating greenhouse gas emissions in our operations 



Exploration and production

 Gas processing 
 High-performance computing 
 Seismic imaging 







Extended reach technology

 Environment and safety 
 Technology 



Hydraulic fracturing

 Environment and safety 
 Technology 







Liquefied natural gas

 Environment and safety 
 Operations 
 Policy 
 Technology 



Vehicle technologies

 Advanced motor oils 
 Advanced plastics 







 ExpandCurrent issues 




Accountability

 Conflict minerals 
 Political involvement 
 Transparency 



Arctic

 Experience 
 Presence 
 Working in the Arctic 
 Community of respect 






Climate

 ExxonMobil's perspective 
 Engaging on climate change 
 Meeting global needs 
 Reducing emissions 
 Driving innovation 
 Promoting efficiency 
 Understanding #ExxonKnew 



Energy policy

 LNG exports 
 U.S. energy policy 







Global Energy Trade

 Global energy commerce 
 U.S. LNG exports 
 Trade agreements and policy 



Oil sands

 Canadian oil sands 
 New and emerging technologies 



Hydraulic fracturing

 Environment and safety 
 Technology 







U.S. tax policy

 American competitiveness 
 Current tax issues 
 U.S. tax and duty payments 



Water

 Fundamentals 
 Policy considerations 
 Water and energy 
 Water framework 








 ExpandEnvironment 




Emergency preparedness

 Spill prevention and response 






Environmental performance

 Air emissions reductions 
 Ecosystem services 
 Environmental drilling initiatives 
 Environmental stewardship 
 Freshwater management 
 Site remediation 
 Spill performance 





 


 





 ExpandCommunity 




Corporate Citizenship Report

 Download the full report and highlights 
 About this report 
 Safety, health and the workplace 
 Environmental performance 
 Managing climate change risks 
 Community and social impact 
 Local development and supply chain management 
 Corporate governance 
 Feedback 






Human rights

 Managing community impacts 
 Respecting rights 
 Security concerns 



Local economic development

 Our approach 
 Local economic growth and development 
 Supplier development 
 Supply chain management 



Malaria

 Partners 
 Program 
 Successes 
 World Malaria Day 







Math and science

 Be an engineer 
 Bernard Harris Summer Science Camp 
 Change the Equation 
 Diversity and international initiatives 
 Mickelson ExxonMobil Teachers Academy 
 National Math and Science Initiative 
 Think it up 
 Other programs 




Socioeconomics

 Indigenous peoples 
 Cultural heritage and diversity 
 Human rights 
 Land use and resettlement 
 Transparency and anti-corruption 
 Community relations 
 Economic development 







Teacher Appreciation Week

 Let's celebrate our teachers 



Women's economic opportunity

 African First Ladies Summit 
 Award-winning mobile service for women entrepreneurs 
 Investing in women 
 Partners 
 Roadmap for promoting women’s economic empowerment 



Worldwide giving

 Employee giving 
 ExxonMobil Foundation 
 Giving guidelines 
 Worldwide Giving Report 








 ExpandCompany 




About us

 Guiding principles 
 History 
 Management 
 Safety and health 



Careers

 Career opportunities 
 Employment policies 
 Global diversity 
 Our employees 






Consumer products and services

 Customer support 
 ExxonMobil payment and rewards 
 Station locator 
 Motor oils 



Contact us

 Directory 
 Email us 
 Request a speaker 
 Business solicitation and recruiting scams 



Multimedia

 Apps 
 Energy lives hereTM 
 Energy Quiz 
 Publications 
 the Lamp 







Corporate governance

 Additional policies and guidelines 
 Board committees 
 Board of directors 
 By-laws 
 Certificate of incorporation 
 Code of ethics and business conduct 
 Contact directors 
 Corporate officers 
 Ethics 
 Guidelines 
 Powers of the board 







News and updates

 News releases and alerts 
 Media contacts 
 Speeches 
 Energy Factor



Worldwide operations

 Brands and products 
 Business divisions 
 Technology Licensing & Catalysts 
 Crude Trading 
 Locations 









  Search 

Navigation Search Bar
Search







Search















 






 Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of Exxon Mobil Corporation 







    Dec 14, 2016 - 03:00 PM EST  



      Dateline:          




                    IRVING, Texas        






EmailPDFPrintRSS 



      Public Company Information:          




NYSE:XOM 






IRVING, Texas--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Rex W. Tillerson, chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon 
      Mobil Corporation (NYSE:XOM), has announced his intention to retire 
      at year-end after more than 41 years of service.
    

      Darren W. Woods, currently president of Exxon Mobil Corporation, has 
      been elected chairman and chief executive officer by the board of 
      directors effective Jan. 1, 2017.
    

      The board of directors congratulated Tillerson on his nomination for the 
      position of U.S. secretary of state.
    

      “We thank Rex for his leadership, service and dedication to ExxonMobil,” 
      said the board.
    

      “He led the company with integrity and honor, ensuring that safety and 
      environmental protection were at the forefront of everything we do, 
      generating value for shareholders and highlighting the impressive 
      accomplishments of the company’s diverse workforce throughout the world. 
      We know that his service to the nation as secretary of state will be 
      equally successful and distinguished.”
    

      Tillerson was scheduled to retire in March 2017 when he reached 65, the 
      company’s mandatory retirement age for his position. After 
      consideration, Tillerson concluded, and the board agreed, that given the 
      significant requirements associated with the confirmation process, it 
      was appropriate to move the retirement date.
    

      Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer. He 
      held various senior roles in the corporation throughout his career 
      spanning more than four decades, including executive vice president of 
      ExxonMobil Development Company.
    

      He was named senior vice president of Exxon Mobil Corporation in 2001 
      and was elected president and member of the board of directors in 2004. 
      Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer in January 
      2006.
    

      Woods, 51, was elected president of ExxonMobil and a member of the board 
      of directors in January 2016.
    

      Born in Wichita, Kansas, Woods joined Exxon Company International in 
      1992. During his career he held various senior domestic and 
      international positions in ExxonMobil Refining & Supply Company, 
      ExxonMobil Chemical Company and Exxon Company International. He also 
      served as manager of ExxonMobil investor relations.
    

      In 2012, he was appointed president of ExxonMobil Refining & Supply 
      Company and a vice president of the corporation. In this role, Woods had 
      primary responsibility for the company’s global refining, supply and 
      transportation activities. In 2014, he was named a senior vice president 
      of the corporation and became a member of its management committee.
    

      Woods earned a bachelor’s degree in electrical engineering from Texas 
      A&M University and a master’s degree in business administration from 
      Northwestern University’s Kellogg School of Management.
    

      Effective and disciplined succession planning is critical to the 
      corporation’s ongoing success and a key component of its competitive 
      advantage. This change in leadership is consistent with the board of 
      directors' succession plan developed years in advance and demonstrates 
      the strength of the management development system.
    

      With the retirement of Tillerson, the ExxonMobil board now is comprised 
      of 12 directors, 11 of whom are non-employees.
    

About ExxonMobil


      ExxonMobil, the largest publicly traded international oil and gas 
      company, uses technology and innovation to help meet the world’s growing 
      energy needs. ExxonMobil holds an industry-leading inventory of 
      resources and is one of the world’s largest integrated refiners, 
      marketers of petroleum products and chemical manufacturers. For more 
      information, visit www.exxonmobil.com 
      or follow us on Twitter www.twitter.com/exxonmobil.
    



 



      Contact:          




       ExxonMobilMedia Relations, 972-444-1107     














 news releasesspeechespublicationsadvertisingnewsfeedsapps  quick linksEnergy OutlookCorporate Citizenship ReportFinancial & Operating Review 


Search Press Releases




Search this site: 

























































Tillerson, Rex W.







Skip to Main Content






DOS Seal

U.S. Department of State
Diplomacy in Action



Toggle Topbar

















Search InputSearch









Jump to In This Section





HomeUnder Secretary for Public Diplomacy and Public AffairsBureau of Public AffairsBureau of Public Affairs: PublicationsBiographiesSenior Officials' Biographies Listed Alphabetically by Last Name
Rex W. Tillerson





Share













Secretary of State




						Term of Appointment: 02/01/2017
									to present
								









Rex W. Tillerson was sworn in as the 69th U.S. Secretary of State on February 1, 2017.
A native of Wichita Falls, Texas, Secretary Tillerson earned a Bachelor of Science degree in civil engineering at the University of Texas at Austin before joining Exxon Company, U.S.A. in 1975 as a production engineer. Secretary Tillerson rose through the ranks to become president of the corporation and a member of the board of directors in 2004, and served as ExxonMobil's chairman and chief executive officer from 2006 to 2016.
Secretary Tillerson has a longstanding involvement with the Boy Scouts of America, earning its highest rank of Distinguished Eagle Scout in his youth. He is a former member of the Boy Scouts of America’s Executive Committee and served as the National President of the Boy Scouts from 2010 to 2012.
Secretary Tillerson is a former member of the American Petroleum Institute and the National Petroleum Council, and was elected to the National Academy of Engineering in 2013. He formerly served as a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies. He was also a member of the Business Roundtable and the Business Council, as well as an honorary trustee of the Business Council for International Understanding, and a member of the Emergency Committee for American Trade. He is a former director of the United Negro College Fund and a former vice-chairman of the Ford’s Theatre Society.














In This Section:



Go Back






Highlights










Learn More















Top



Javascript is disabled in your browser. For the best experience on this web site, please enable Javascript.


























Biographies







Skip to Main Content






DOS Seal

U.S. Department of State
Diplomacy in Action



Toggle Topbar

















Search InputSearch









Jump to In This Section




HomeUnder Secretary for Public Diplomacy and Public AffairsBureau of Public AffairsBureau of Public Affairs: Publications
Biographies





Share






To find a list of Principal Officers, Assistant Secretaries, Ambassadors and Chiefs of Mission, please select a link from "In This Section". Biographies of these individuals are posted when available.









In This Section:



Senior Officials Listed by Last Name


Senior Officials Listed by Title or Country


Other Officials Listed by Last Name






Highlights










Learn More















Top



Javascript is disabled in your browser. For the best experience on this web site, please enable Javascript.




 




Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State - The New York Times





















































































































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation
View mobile version




The New York Times





Politics|Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State







Search

Subscribe Now
Log In


0
Settings




Close search



https://nyti.ms/2hyn5ag








Advertisement








Supported by



Politics

Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State

By DAVID E. SANGER, MAGGIE HABERMAN and CLIFFORD KRAUSSDEC. 10, 2016



Continue reading the main story
Share This Page

Continue reading the main story












Photo






Rex W. Tillerson, right, with President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia, center, in 2012.

Credit
            Mikhail Klimentyev/RIA Novosti        



WASHINGTON — Rex W. Tillerson, the chief executive of Exxon Mobil, whose extensive deal-making for the energy giant has plunged him into global politics from Yemen to Russia, is expected to be offered the secretary of state post this weekend by President-elect Donald J. Trump, according to two people close to Mr. Trump’s transition team.Mr. Tillerson has close ties with President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia, whom he has known for more than two decades. Russia awarded Mr. Tillerson its Order of Friendship in 2013, the year before Washington’s relationship with Moscow sank into a deep freeze over Russia’s annexation of Crimea and its shadow war in eastern Ukraine.Relations with Russia have grown only more troubled since American intelligence agencies formally determined shortly after the November election that Russia had taken steps intended to help Mr. Trump win.Mr. Tillerson, with no background in diplomacy outside the energy arena, would inherit those problems. He would also face the question of whether to maintain sanctions on Russia — penalties he has criticized for slowing Exxon’s investments in that country.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

His connections to Russia are sure to come under scrutiny during a Senate confirmation hearing.Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, said on Saturday that Mr. Tillerson’s ties to Mr. Putin were “a matter of concern to me.” “I’d have to examine it,” he said on Fox News, adding that “Vladimir Putin is a thug, bully and a murderer, and anybody else who describes him as anything else is lying.” Continue reading the main story







Advertisement

Continue reading the main story





Mr. Tillerson’s success in business gives him a major credential with Mr. Trump, who values that background, along with loyalty, above other traits. He would be one of several wealthy business executives in top administration jobs.Mr. Tillerson met with Mr. Trump for more than two hours on Saturday at Trump Tower in New York, and two of the president-elect’s key advisers, his chief strategist, Stephen K. Bannon, and his son-in-law, Jared Kushner, have told Mr. Trump that Mr. Tillerson is in a “different league” from his other options.But Mr. Trump is famously mercurial and could change his mind before making his final decision public. A transition spokesman, Jason Miller, declined to comment. Among the other contenders have been Mitt Romney, the 2012 Republican presidential nominee, and Senator Bob Corker of Tennessee, the chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee.Mr. Trump’s team has discussed the possibility of appointing as deputy secretary John R. Bolton, a highly conservative and combative veteran of the George W. Bush administration. Mr. Trump has also spoken with Richard N. Haass, the president of the Council on Foreign Relations and a far more centrist figure. 








                    OPEN Graphic                



            Graphic: Donald Trump’s Cabinet is Complete. Here’s the Full List.        


Mr. Tillerson, 64, has spent the past 41 years at Exxon, where he began as a production engineer and went on to strike deals around the world for a company that explores, buys and sells oil and gas in some of the globe’s most troubled corners.If confirmed by the Senate, Mr. Tillerson will deal with many of the world leaders he encountered at Exxon, but with a very different agenda. In addition to an increasingly aggressive Russia, he will have to manage a raging war in Syria that has consumed the last year of diplomatic efforts by Secretary of State John Kerry, a rising China that is staking claims in the South China Sea, and a North Korea that is growing closer to being able to launch a nuclear-armed missile at the United States.The kind of deal-making diplomacy that Mr. Tillerson has excelled at is far different from the alliance-building required of a secretary of state, often without the incentive of profits for negotiating partners.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

Mr. Tillerson assumed the role of chairman and chief executive of Exxon Mobil in January 2006, and during his tenure the company acknowledged, for the first time, the science underlying climate change. It has said it supports the creation of a carbon tax, which most Republicans have opposed, and it also supported the Paris climate agreement, a major focus of Mr. Kerry’s time in office. Mr. Trump has vowed to abandon the climate pact.In May, Mr. Tillerson told shareholders that “we believe that addressing the risk of climate change is a global issue,” adding that it would require the cooperation of governments, businesses and individuals.Executives at Exxon describe Mr. Tillerson as a strong leader, accustomed to making decisions and giving orders. Some have expressed surprise that he would be interested in the job of secretary of state, because he would not be the final decision maker.A native of Wichita Falls, Tex., Mr. Tillerson speaks with a strong Texas twang and is known for quoting Boy Scout creeds. If he has faced a failure as a leader of Exxon, it was that he was slow to invest in the oil and gas shale fields around Texas and North Dakota. Preferring to invest in big, expensive projects around the world, he left the shale fields open to smaller, more nimble independent companies.When he finally bought XTO, a shale gas-producing company, in 2009 for over $30 billion, he did so when natural gas prices were at a peak. After paying a premium for the company, Exxon’s earnings have suffered in recent years.Still, in total, Mr. Tillerson has excelled in the somewhat rigid atmosphere inside Exxon. Steve Coll, the author of “Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power,” noted in 2012 that Mr. Tillerson presided over a company that had succeeded “where the question is numbers, or engineering effectiveness, or worker safety performance.”“But when the question involves the human factor, building trust with your communities where you’re drilling, or convincing people that fracking is not going to ruin their water, or dealing with political environments in 150 different countries with lots of supply problems, or dealing with violence on the ground around your oil fields in Africa — in all of those areas, I think they have a habit of not really taking anybody’s advice,” Mr. Coll said.
Newsletter Sign Up
Continue reading the main story
Get the Morning Briefing by Email What you need to know to start your day, delivered to your inbox Monday through Friday. 


Please verify you're not a robot by clicking the box.
Invalid email address. Please re-enter.
You must select a newsletter to subscribe to.



Sign Up







You agree to receive occasional updates and special offers for The New York Times's products and services.





Thank you for subscribing.
An error has occurred. Please try again later.
You are already subscribed to this email.
View all New York Times newsletters.


See Sample
Manage Email Preferences
Not you?
Privacy Policy
Opt out or contact us anytime




“They keep the windows closed,” added Mr. Coll, now the dean of the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism. “They have an enormous amount of confidence in themselves, and I think they defeat themselves in these other areas of political communications more often than they need to.”

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

The question is how Mr. Tillerson will mesh with the far less hierarchical world of the State Department, where dissent is common, leaks about decision-making are often the order of the day, and success and failure are not measured on a balance sheet.He is no stranger to political upheaval, however. Exxon has operations in about 50 countries, and Mr. Tillerson has not been shy about promoting the interests of his company, whether they coincide with American policy or not.Shortly after he took the helm, President Hugo Chávez of Venezuela moved to nationalize the assets of 22 foreign oil companies. Most chose to negotiate compensation arrangements. But Exxon Mobil, along with ConocoPhillips, took Venezuela to international arbitration court, and in 2014 Exxon won a $1.6 billion compensation package.It was a fraction of what the company had demanded, but Exxon showed unusual toughness. The company also mobilized a serious exploration effort in Guyanese waters claimed by Venezuela, and that work is expected to eventually result in major production.Exxon has close ties to the Qatari national oil company, and has partnered with the Qataris in building a liquefied natural gas terminal on the Gulf of Mexico coast that is designed for importing gas and may eventually be used for exporting it, as well.He has also signed deals to develop oil fields in the autonomous region of Kurdistan, angering an important American ally, Iraq, which bars such direct dealings.But most controversial is Exxon’s close relationship with Russia, which Mr. Tillerson has worked hard to strengthen. Exxon has various joint ventures around Russia with the state-backed oil giant Rosneft, and has contributed to social programs in education and health.Western sanctions prohibiting certain energy development activities have posed a hurdle to Exxon’s investments in Russia, particularly a joint venture with Rosneft that was supposed to start drilling for oil in 2014 in the Kara Sea, part of the Arctic Ocean. Mr. Tillerson has spoken out against sanctions in part because the company is unable to collect revenues from an investment in an oil and gas consortium to which Exxon belongs that operates off Sakhalin Island.

“We always encourage the people who are making those decisions to consider the very broad collateral damage of who are they really harming with sanctions,” Mr. Tillerson told shareholders at the company’s 2014 annual meeting.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

Last week, Exxon became a major player in Mexico by successfully bidding with other international oil companies for the right to explore and develop deepwater reserves. The auction came at a time when Mexico is primed for a confrontation with Mr. Trump, who has vowed to build a wall along the border.
Continue reading the main story






We’re interested in your feedback on this page. Tell us what you think.









The Trump White House
The historic moments, head-spinning developments and inside-the-White House intrigue.









                                ‘I Did Not Collude,’ Kushner Says in Prepared Remarks to Senators            
JUL 24








                                Anthony Scaramucci, New Communications Chief, Woos Trump on TV            
JUL 23








                                For Trump and Putin, Sanctions Are a Setback Both Sought to Avoid            
JUL 23








                                U.S. Army Sergeant Is Charged With Trying to Aid Islamic State            
JUL 23








                                How Trump Got It Wrong in Saying The Times ‘Foiled’ Killing of ISIS Leader            
JUL 23













Related Coverage









Opinion                         Frank Bruni


Donald Trump’s Bottomless Secretarial Pool
DEC. 10, 2016













Exxon Mobil Chief Rises as Trump’s Choice for Secretary of State
DEC. 9, 2016













Donald Trump, in Louisiana, Says He Will End Energy Regulations
DEC. 9, 2016













Trump Spent Far Less Than Clinton, but Paid His Companies Well
DEC. 9, 2016




































Related Coverage






Opinion                         Frank Bruni


Donald Trump’s Bottomless Secretarial Pool
DEC. 10, 2016













Exxon Mobil Chief Rises as Trump’s Choice for Secretary of State
DEC. 9, 2016













Donald Trump, in Louisiana, Says He Will End Energy Regulations
DEC. 9, 2016













Trump Spent Far Less Than Clinton, but Paid His Companies Well
DEC. 9, 2016















What's Next


Loading...









Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times

































Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected To Be Pick For Secretary Of State - Roughneck City




































Wish List (0)
Shopping Cart
Checkout
My Account

Register
Login


 USA/Canada (888) 641-0217 
 International +011 580-526-3953

































 
        


















Product Categories


Jewelry and Keychains (12)
Skin Protection Lotion (1)
Oilfield Photography  >  Wooden Derricks (1)
Oilfield Stickers (8)
Oilfield Gloves (3)
Safety Glasses (37)
Nozzle Gauge/Thread Identifier (2)
Oilfield Models (4)
Tally Books/Refills (7)
Hoodies (3)
Dew Rags (3)
Zero Hoods (6)
Oilfield Photography (0)
T-Shirts (6)
Oilfield Music CD's (3)
Slicker Suits (7)










Roughneck News 







Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected To Be Pick For Secretary Of State
                            December 10, 2016
Source: The New York Times
 Rex W. Tillerson, the chief executive of Exxon Mobil, whose extensive deal-making for the energy giant has plunged him into global politics from Yemen to Russia, is expected to be offered the secretary of state post this weekend by President-elect Donald J. Trump, according to two people close to Mr. Trump’s transition team.
Mr. Tillerson has close ties with President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia, whom he has known for more than two decades. Russia awarded Mr. Tillerson its Order of Friendship in 2013, the year before Washington’s relationship with Moscow was plunged into a deep freeze over Russia’s annexation of Crimea and its shadow war in eastern Ukraine.
Relations with Russia have grown only more troubled since American intelligence agencies formally determined shortly after the November election that Russia had taken steps intended to help Mr. Trump win.
Mr. Tillerson, with no background in diplomacy outside the energy arena, would inherit those problems. He would also face the question of whether to maintain sanctions on Russia — penalties he has criticized for slowing Exxon’s investments in that country.
His connections to Russia are sure to come under scrutiny during a Senate confirmation hearing.
Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, said on Saturday that Mr. Tillerson’s ties to Mr. Putin were “a matter of concern to me.” “I’d have to examine it,” he said on Fox News, adding that “Vladimir Putin is a thug, bully and a murderer, and anybody else who describes him as anything else is lying.”
Mr. Tillerson’s success in business gives him a major credential with Mr. Trump, who values that background, along with loyalty, above other traits. He would be one of several wealthy business executives in top administration jobs.
Mr. Tillerson met with Mr. Trump for more than two hours on Saturday at Trump Tower in New York, and two of the president-elect’s key advisers, his chief strategist, Stephen K. Bannon, and his son-in-law, Jared Kushner, have told Mr. Trump that Mr. Tillerson is in a “different league” from his other options.
But Mr. Trump is famously mercurial and could change his mind before making his final decision public. A transition spokesman, Jason Miller, declined to comment. Among the other contenders have been Mitt Romney, the 2012 Republican presidential nominee, and Senator Bob Corker of Tennessee, the chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee.

Mr. Trump’s team has discussed the possibility of appointing as deputy secretary John R. Bolton, a highly conservative and combative veteran of the George W. Bush administration. Mr. Trump has also spoken with Richard N. Haass, the president of the Council on Foreign Relations and a far more centrist figure.
Mr. Tillerson, 64, has spent the past 41 years at Exxon, where he began as a production engineer and went on to strike deals around the world for a company that explores, buys and sells oil and gas in some of the globe’s most troubled corners.
If confirmed by the Senate, Mr. Tillerson will deal with many of the world leaders he encountered at Exxon, but with a very different agenda. In addition to an increasingly aggressive Russia, he will have to manage a raging war in Syria that has consumed the last year of diplomatic efforts by Secretary of State John Kerry, a rising China that is staking claims in the South China Sea, and a North Korea that is growing closer to being able to launch a nuclear-armed missile at the United States.
The kind of deal-making diplomacy that Mr. Tillerson has excelled at is far different from the alliance-building required of a secretary of state, often without the incentive of profits for negotiating partners.
Mr. Tillerson assumed the role of chairman and chief executive of Exxon Mobil in January 2006, and during his tenure the company acknowledged, for the first time, the science underlying climate change. It has said it supports the creation of a carbon tax, which most Republicans have opposed, and it also supported the Paris climate agreement, a major focus of Mr. Kerry’s time in office. Mr. Trump has vowed to abandon the climate pact.
In May, Mr. Tillerson told shareholders that “we believe that addressing the risk of climate change is a global issue,” adding that it would require the cooperation of governments, businesses and individuals.
Executives at Exxon describe Mr. Tillerson as a strong leader, accustomed to making decisions and giving orders. Some have expressed surprise that he would be interested in the job of secretary of state, because he would not be the final decision maker.
A native of Wichita Falls, Tex., Mr. Tillerson speaks with a strong Texas twang and is known for quoting Boy Scout creeds. If he has faced a failure as a leader of Exxon, it was that he was slow to invest in the oil and gas shale fields around Texas and North Dakota. Preferring to invest in big, expensive projects around the world, he left the shale fields open to smaller, more nimble independent companies.
When he finally bought TXU, a shale gas-producing company, in 2009 for over $30 billion, he did so when natural gas prices were at a peak. After paying a premium for the company, Exxon’s earnings have suffered in recent years.
Still, in total, Mr. Tillerson has excelled in the somewhat rigid atmosphere inside Exxon. Steve Coll, the author of “Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power,” noted in 2012 that Mr. Tillerson presided over a company that had succeeded “where the question is numbers, or engineering effectiveness, or worker safety performance.”
“But when the question involves the human factor, building trust with your communities where you’re drilling, or convincing people that fracking is not going to ruin their water, or dealing with political environments in 150 different countries with lots of supply problems, or dealing with violence on the ground around your oil fields in Africa — in all of those areas, I think they have a habit of not really taking anybody’s advice,” Mr. Coll said.
They keep the windows closed,” added Mr. Coll, now the dean of the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism. “They have an enormous amount of confidence in themselves, and I think they defeat themselves in these other areas of political communications more often than they need to.”
The question is how Mr. Tillerson will mesh with the far less hierarchical world of the State Department, where dissent is common, leaks about decision-making are often the order of the day, and success and failure are not measured on a balance sheet.
He is no stranger to political upheaval, however. Exxon has operations in about 50 countries, and Mr. Tillerson has not been shy about promoting the interests of his company, whether they coincide with American policy or not.
Shortly after he took the helm, President Hugo Chávez of Venezuela moved to nationalize the assets of 22 foreign oil companies. Most chose to negotiate compensation arrangements. But Exxon Mobil, along with ConocoPhillips, took Venezuela to international arbitration court, and in 2014 Exxon won a $1.6 billion compensation package.
It was a fraction of what the company had demanded, but Exxon showed unusual toughness. The company also mobilized a serious exploration effort in Guyanese waters claimed by Venezuela, and that work is expected to eventually result in major production.

Exxon has close ties to the Qatari national oil company, and has partnered with the Qataris in building a liquefied natural gas terminal on the Gulf of Mexico coast that is designed for importing gas and may eventually be used for exporting it, as well.
He has also signed deals to develop oil fields in the autonomous region of Kurdistan, angering an important American ally, Iraq, which bars such direct dealings.
But most controversial is Exxon’s close relationship with Russia, which Mr. Tillerson has worked hard to strengthen. Exxon has various joint ventures around Russia with the state-backed oil giant Rosneft, and has contributed to social programs in education and health.
Western sanctions prohibiting certain energy development activities have posed a hurdle to Exxon’s investments in Russia, particularly a joint venture with Rosneft that was supposed to start drilling for oil in 2014 in the Kara Sea, part of the Arctic Ocean. Mr. Tillerson has spoken out against sanctions in part because the company is unable to collect revenues from an investment in an oil and gas consortium to which Exxon belongs that operates off Sakhalin Island.
“We always encourage the people who are making those decisions to consider the very broad collateral damage of who are they really harming with sanctions,” Mr. Tillerson told shareholders at the company’s 2014 annual meeting.
Last week, Exxon became a major player in Mexico by successfully bidding with other international oil companies for the right to explore and develop deepwater reserves. The auction came at a time when Mexico is primed for a confrontation with Mr. Trump, who has vowed to build a wall along the border.
Comment On This Article


































































Tags


















































Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Tillerson)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Tillerson)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Tillerson)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Tillerson)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Tillerson)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Forbes WelcomeCLOSE   More Options   Quote of the Day  If I'm being rejected from one thing, it's really just the path redirecting me elsewhere to where I'm supposed to be. Amani Al-Khatahtbeh, Founder of MuslimGirl    Rex Tillerson, ExxonMobil CEO,  is Trump's choice for secretary of state - CNNPolitics.comBreaking NewsTrump picks ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson as choice for secretary of stateBy Phil Mattingly, Jim Acosta and Stephen Collinson, CNNUpdated 1258 GMT (2058 HKT) December 13, 2016 Chat with us in Facebook Messenger. Find out what's happening in the world as it unfolds.JUST WATCHEDRex Tillerson in 60 secondsReplayMore Videos ...MUST WATCH (16 Videos)Rex Tillerson in 60 secondsUnfilled roles a cause for concern?Tapper: Trump administration isn't transparentAnother Trump Army secretary pick drops out Who is Michael Caputo?President Trump flips on key issuesNikki Haley says Trump doesn't limit herCNN panelist: Trump is the MLK of health care Trump signs anti-Planned Parenthood lawSee Trump's bill you're paying forWhat you need to know about Jared KushnerTillerson used email alias at Exxon Sources: Trump approved staff phone searchWH adviser doubles down on voter fraud claimChristie will work in private sector, not W.H.Trump picks ex-Bush official to lead DHSStory highlightsTillerson, 64, has no formal foreign policy experienceBut he has built close relationships with many world leaders (CNN)President-elect Donald Trump has chosen ExxonMobil CEO Rex Tillerson to serve as secretary of state, the transition team announced Tuesday, setting up a heated Senate confirmation battle and signaling a desire to ease Washington's estrangement with Russia.Like Trump, Tillerson, 64, has no formal foreign policy experience, but has built close relationships with many world leaders by closing massive deals across Eurasia and the Middle East on behalf of the world's largest energy company."His tenacity, broad experience and deep understanding of geopolitics make him an excellent choice for Secretary of State," Trump said in the statement.Tillerson was originally a dark horse for the secretary of state nomination, but emerged from a lengthy public interview and vetting process that included better-known quantities like former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani, 2012 GOP nominee Mitt Romney and Sen. Bob Corker, chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations committee.Tillerson could face uphill battle on Capitol HillRead MoreRomney confirmed he was not the pick in a Facebook post Monday night, and Trump tweeted that he will announce his pick Tuesday morning.I will be making my announcement on the next Secretary of State tomorrow morning.— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) December 13, 2016
Trump has called Tillerson a "world-class player" and the transition team is likely to stress that his mastery of complex negotiations and knowledge of geopolitical factors shaping the oil industry are directly relevant to heading US diplomacy and managing the State Department.Tillerson was recommended to Trump by former secretaries of state Condoleezza Rice and James Baker and former Secretary of Defense Bob Gates, sources told CNN. Trump and Tillerson possess similar dealmaking business backgrounds and similar views of the world, sources said, and there was a level of comfort that Trump hadn't found with anyone else.Trump's decision to press ahead with the Tillerson nomination could ignite the first big showdown between the new White House and Capitol Hill and set a benchmark for Republicans worried about the direction of the President-elect's own foreign policy. It will also embolden Democrats who see Tillerson as perhaps the most vulnerable Trump Cabinet appointee to a bruising Senate confirmation battle.One Trump official told CNN there's a plan to sell Tillerson to skeptical senators and the transition team believes the more lawmakers get to know him, the more comfortable they will be.Republican hawks such as Sens. John McCain and Marco Rubio are deeply perturbed by the close relationship Tillerson forged with Russian President Vladimir Putin. They fear Trump and Tillerson would bring US policy far more in line with Russia, which is locked in the worst confrontation with Washington since the Cold War and is seeking to again become a great power rival to the United States.Romney confirms he's not Trump's pick for secretary of stateTillerson, a multi-millionaire, he will be an easy fit in the roughly one-third of Trump's emerging Cabinet which is made up of corporate titans and wealthy Wall Street players. He is also another down-payment by the President-elect to tear down the political establishment in Washington and to replace the inhabitants of what he has called a "swamp" with new blood and potential cabinet secretaries with real world experience.But in order to be confirmed, Tillerson must satisfy senators that there is more to him than a businessman eyeing a new challenge in statesmanship.Not much is known, for instance, about his personal views on international relations as distinct from the positions of his company.His views on the alliances like NATO and in Asia that have sustained American power and global security since World War II — on which Trump cast doubt during the presidential campaign -- are largely unknown.He will have to explain why his own lack of formal foreign policy experience is not a disqualifying feature of his resume. After all, negotiating is just one aspect of the job of secretary of state. The top US diplomat must also frame a coherent foreign policy doctrine for the United States, exemplify its values, have a deep grounding in history and understand the complicated motivations of its international partners and adversaries.The confirmation hearing would also force Tillerson to develop positions on issues ranging from global warming to North Korea's nuclear program and US humanitarian aid in the developing world.Order of friendship from PutinTillerson developed his close ties with Putin as he negotiated a deal with Russian oil giant Rosneft to provide access to lucrative oil resources in the Arctic. The agreement will be at the center of his confirmation hearing.Trump vs. Trump's CabinetFor his efforts, Putin awarded Tillerson Russia's prestigious Order of Friendship in 2013. The deal has so far not yielded its promise.Exxon was hit hard by a round of US and European Union sanctions that targeted Russia in 2014 for its intervention in Ukraine. Exxon said it could have lost up to $1 billion due to the sanctions, according to regulatory filings.  The sanctions issue will provide ammunition for Democratic senators keen to probe apparent glaring conflicts of interests across the nascent Trump administration.Even if Tillerson were to sever all links and investments related to ExxonMobil, action he took as secretary of state -- for instance, advocating the lifting of sanctions against Russia over its annexation of Ukraine -- could clearly benefit the firm and his former industry. Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpPresident-elect Donald Trump shakes hands with Martin Luther King III after they met at Trump Tower in New York on Monday, January 16. Afterward, King said the meeting was "constructive" and that the two discussed the importance of voting accessibility. Trump didn't speak to the media about the meeting.Hide Caption 1 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump speaks at Trump Tower in New York on Wednesday, January 11. In his first news conference since winning the election, a combative Trump made clear he will not mute his style when he is inaugurated on January 20. He lashed out at media and political foes alike.Hide Caption 2 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpUS Sen. Jeff Sessions, Trump's nominee for attorney general, is sworn in during his confirmation hearing in Washington on Tuesday, January 10. Trump and his transition team are in the process of filling high-level positions for the new administration.Hide Caption 3 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpJared Kushner, Trump's son-in-law, arrives on Capitol Hill for a meeting with House Speaker Paul Ryan on Monday, January 9. Kushner, a 35-year-old businessman-turned-political strategist, will be senior adviser to the president, a senior transition official told CNN.Hide Caption 4 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump gets on an elevator after speaking with reporters at New York's Trump Tower on January 9.Hide Caption 5 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump stands with Alibaba Executive Chairman Jack Ma, Asia's richest man, as they walk to speak with reporters at Trump Tower on January 9. Ma met with Trump to tease plans for creating "one million" jobs in the United States. Trump praised Ma after the meeting as a "great, great entrepreneur and one of the best in the world."Hide Caption 6 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump stands with legendary boxing promoter Don King after meeting at Trump's Mar-a-Lago resort in Palm Beach, Florida, on Wednesday, December 28. Trump and King met to discuss the relationship between Israel and the United States.Hide Caption 7 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump attends a meeting with Steve Bannon, chief White House strategist and senior counselor, at his Mar-a-Lago resort on Wednesday, December 21. Trump spent the holidays in Mar-a-Lago.Hide Caption 8 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump spokeswoman Kellyanne Conway talks to the press in the lobby of Trump Tower in New York on Thursday, December 15. Conway, who was Trump's campaign manager, will work in his administration as "counselor to the president," it was announced on Thursday, December 22.Hide Caption 9 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump meets with technology executives in New York on Wednesday, December 14. From left are Jeff Bezos, chief executive officer of Amazon; Larry Page, chief executive officer of Google's parent company Alphabet; Sheryl Sandberg, chief operating officer of Facebook; and Vice President-elect Mike Pence. The three main areas discussed were jobs, immigration and China, according to a source briefed on the meeting.Hide Caption 10 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpThree of Trump's children -- from left, Donald Jr., Ivanka and Eric -- attend the meeting with tech leaders on December 14.Hide Caption 11 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump, Pence and House Speaker Paul Ryan wave during an event in West Allis, Wisconsin, on Tuesday, December 13. "He's like a fine wine," Trump said of Ryan at the rally, which was part of his "thank you" tour to states that helped him win the election. "Every day that goes by, I get to appreciate his genius more and more."Hide Caption 12 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump and rapper Kanye West speak to the press after meeting at Trump Tower in New York on December 13. Trump called West a "good man" and told journalists that they have been "friends for a long time." West later tweeted that he met with Trump to discuss "multicultural issues."Hide Caption 13 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump selected former Texas Gov. Rick Perry, right, to be his nominee for energy secretary, which would make Perry the head of an agency he once suggested he would eliminate.Hide Caption 14 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump has tapped ExxonMobil CEO Rex Tillerson to serve as secretary of state, the transition team announced December 13. Tillerson, seen here at a conference in 2015, has no formal foreign-policy experience, but he has built close relationships with many world leaders by closing massive deals across Eurasia and the Middle East on behalf of the world's largest energy company.Hide Caption 15 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump waves during the Army-Navy football game, which was played in Baltimore on Saturday, December 10. Hide Caption 16 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpBetsy DeVos, Trump's pick for education secretary, speaks during an event in Grand Rapids, Michigan, on Friday, December 9.Hide Caption 17 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump shakes hands with Iowa Gov. Terry Branstad at an event in Des Moines, Iowa, on Thursday, December 8. Trump re-introduced Branstad as his pick for US ambassador to China.Hide Caption 18 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump greets retired Marine Gen. James Mattis at a rally in Fayetteville, North Carolina, on Tuesday, December 6. Trump said he would nominate Mattis as his defense secretary.Hide Caption 19 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump speaks to members of the media at Trump Tower in New York on December 6. Hide Caption 20 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump visits the Carrier air-conditioning company in Indianapolis on Thursday, December 1. Carrier announced that it had reached a deal with Trump and Vice President-elect Mike Pence, who is currently governor of Indiana, to keep about 1,000 of 1,400 jobs at its Indianapolis plant rather than move them to Mexico. The Carrier plant had been a theme of Trump's campaign promise to prevent more jobs from being outsourced to other countries.Hide Caption 21 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump and former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney share a meal in New York on Tuesday, November 29. Romney was reportedly in the running for secretary of state.Hide Caption 22 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump waves to a crowd at The New York Times building after meeting with some of the newspaper's reporters, editors and columnists on Tuesday, November 22. Six takeaways from the meetingHide Caption 23 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump is flanked by Pence and  Romney after a meeting in Bedminster Township, New Jersey, on Saturday, November 19.Hide Caption 24 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect Trump"60 Minutes" correspondent Lesley Stahl interviews Trump and his family at his New York home on Friday, November 11. It was Trump's first television interview since the election.Hide Caption 25 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpHouse Speaker Paul Ryan shows Trump and his wife, Melania, the Speaker's Balcony at the US Capitol on Thursday, November 10.Hide Caption 26 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpRyan listens as Trump speaks to the press at the US Capitol on November 10. Trump talked about his eagerness to join forces with Ryan to begin implementing new policies.Hide Caption 27 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump walks with his wife and Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell after a meeting at the US Capitol on November 10. Hide Caption 28 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump shakes hands with President Barack Obama following a meeting in the Oval Office on November 10. Obama told his successor that he wanted him to succeed and would do everything he could to ensure a smooth transition.Hide Caption 29 of 30 Photos: In transition: President-elect TrumpTrump delivers his acceptance speech during his election night event at the New York Hilton Midtown hotel on Wednesday, November 9.Hide Caption 30 of 30Experience at ExxonMobilTillerson, a native of Wichita Falls, Texas, has worked for ExxonMobil for 40 years after joining the firm as a production engineer and has steered the giant global firm since 2006.Through the end of 2015, he had made more than $240 million as CEO, according to an analysis from board and executive data provider Equilar.That total includes his base salary, bonuses, stock awards and other compensation over 10 years.His nomination will be greeted with dismay by climate activists and environmentalists who will see it as tantamount to a takeover of US foreign policy by Big Oil.But he worked to somewhat soften ExxonMobil's stance on climate change since. When he took over in 2006, the company was struggling with how to balance its corporate interests with a growing public consensus on global warming, according to Steven Coll's book "Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power."Under the previous CEO Lee Raymond, ExxonMobil promoted skepticism about the science of climate change. But Tillerson quietly adjusted the company's position on the issue, according to Coll."Greenhouse gas emissions could prove to be significant," Tillerson said in a speech to the Council on Foreign Relations in 2007. "So it has been ExxonMobil's view for some time that it is prudent to take action while accommodating the uncertainties that remain."


Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rex Tillerson - Wikipedia






















 






Rex Tillerson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Rex Tillerson








69th United States Secretary of State



Incumbent



Assumed office
February 1, 2017


President
Donald Trump


Deputy
Tom Shannon (Acting)
John Sullivan


Preceded by
John Kerry


33rd President of the Boy Scouts of America


In office
May 26, 2010 – April 30, 2012


Preceded by
John Gottschalk


Succeeded by
Wayne Perry





Personal details


Born
Rex Wayne Tillerson
(1952-03-23) March 23, 1952 (age 65)
Wichita Falls, Texas, U.S.


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Renda St. Clair (1986–present)


Children
4


Education
University of Texas, Austin (BS)


Occupation
CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2016)


Net worth
$245 million (2016)


Awards
Eagle Scout (1965)
Order of Friendship (Russia) (2013)
Dewhurst Award (2017)


Rex Wayne Tillerson (born March 23, 1952) is an American politician, civil engineer, and former energy executive who is the 69th and current United States Secretary of State, serving since February 1, 2017.[1] Tillerson joined Exxon in 1975 and rose to serve as the chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of ExxonMobil from 2006 to 2016.
Tillerson began his career as an engineer and holds a bachelor's degree in civil engineering from the University of Texas at Austin. By 1989 he had become general manager of the Exxon USA central production division. In 1995, he became president of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc. In 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer of Exxon, the world's 6th largest company by revenue.[2][3] Tillerson retired from Exxon effective January 1, 2017, and was succeeded by Darren Woods.[4] He is a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[2]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America and earned the rank of Eagle Scout. From 2010 to 2012 he was the national president of the Boy Scouts, its highest non-executive position. He is a longtime contributor to Republican campaigns, although he did not donate to Donald Trump's presidential campaign. In 2014, Tillerson, who had made business deals on behalf of Exxon with Russian President Vladimir Putin, opposed the sanctions against Russia.[5] He has previously been the director of the joint US-Russian oil company Exxon Neftegas.[6][7]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career

2.1 Exxon

2.1.1 Ties with Russia
2.1.2 Compensation
2.1.3 Wayne Tracker alias


2.2 Other affiliations


3 Political involvement

3.1 Political views

3.1.1 Russia and Saudi Arabia
3.1.2 Climate change and carbon tax
3.1.3 Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)
3.1.4 Free trade
3.1.5 Government regulation
3.1.6 Education


3.2 Republican campaign fundraising and donations


4 Secretary of State

4.1 Nomination and confirmation
4.2 Tenure


5 Personal life
6 See also
7 References
8 Further reading
9 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952, in Wichita Falls, Texas, the son of Patty Sue (née Patton) and Bobby Joe Tillerson.[8] He was raised in Vernon, Texas; Stillwater, Oklahoma; and Huntsville, Texas.[9][10] He has two sisters.[11] His sister Rae Ann Hamilton is a physician and resides in Abilene, Texas.[12] The other, Jo Lynn Peters, is a high school educator.[11]
Tillerson's father was an executive of the Boy Scouts of America organization, and this led to his family's move to Huntsville, Texas.[13] Tillerson himself has been active in the Boy Scouts for most of his life, and in his youth he earned the rank of Eagle Scout[14] in 1965. At 14 he began to work as a bus boy in the student union building at Oklahoma State University.[15] Two years later in 1968 he became a janitor working in one of the engineering buildings at the University.[15]
Tillerson graduated from Huntsville High School[13] in 1970.[10] He was a section leader for the percussion section of his high school band, in which he played the kettle drums and snare drum, and he earned spots in the all-district and all-region bands during his senior year.[13] He received a Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering from the University of Texas at Austin in 1975.[16] During his time at UT Austin, he was involved with the Tejas Club,[17] and the Longhorn Band.[17]
Career[edit]
Exxon[edit]
Tillerson joined Exxon Company USA in 1975 as a production engineer.[2] In 1989, Tillerson became general manager of the central production division of Exxon USA. In 1995, he became President of Exxon Yemen Inc. and Esso Exploration and Production Khorat Inc.[2]
In 1998, he became a vice president of Exxon Ventures (CIS) and president of Exxon Neftegas Limited with responsibility for Exxon's holdings in Russia and the Caspian Sea. In 1999, with the merger of Exxon and Mobil, he was named executive vice president of ExxonMobil Development Company. In 2004, he became president and director of ExxonMobil.[18] Upon this appointment Tillerson's replacement of Lee Raymond as CEO of Exxon Mobil was implied.[19] His major competitor was Ed Galante, another Exxon executive.[20] On January 1, 2006, Tillerson was elected chairman and chief executive officer (CEO), following the retirement of Lee Raymond.[2]
Under Tillerson's leadership, ExxonMobil cooperated closely with Saudi Arabia, the world's largest oil exporter and a longtime U.S. ally, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.[21] From 2003 to 2005, a European subsidiary of ExxonMobil, Infineum, operated in the Middle East providing sales to Iran, Sudan and Syria. ExxonMobil stated that they followed all legal framework and that such sales were minuscule compared to their annual revenue of $371 billion at the time.[22] In 2009, ExxonMobil acquired XTO Energy, a major natural gas producer, for $31 billion in stock. Michael Corkery of the Wall Street Journal wrote that "Tillerson's legacy rides on the XTO Deal."[23]
On January 4, 2017, The Financial Times reported that Tillerson would cut his ExxonMobil ties if he became Secretary of State.[24] Walter Shaub, the director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said he was proud of the ethics agreement developed for Tillerson, who was now "free of financial conflicts of interest. His ethics agreement serves as a sterling model for what we'd like to see with other nominees."[25][26]
Ties with Russia[edit]




Tillerson with President Vladimir Putin and Igor Sechin, the head of state-controlled energy giant Rosneft, at the Tuapse, 2012


Tillerson has ties with President of Russia Vladimir Putin.[6] They have been associates since Tillerson represented Exxon's interests in Russia, the world's largest producer of crude oil, during President Boris Yeltsin's tenure.[27] Tillerson was responsible for the development of a partnership between Exxon and state-owned oil company Rosneft and the ultimately unsuccessful attempt to acquire a stake in Yukos, owned by Mikhail Khordorkovsky, before the firm was nationalized after Khordovsky's arrest.[28] John Hamre, the President and CEO of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, of which Tillerson is a board member, states that Tillerson "has had more interactive time with Vladimir Putin than probably any other American, with the exception of Dr. Henry Kissinger."[27]
Tillerson was a friend of Igor Sechin,[29] the Executive Chairman of Rosneft, the Russian state oil company, and leader of the Kremlin's Siloviki (security/military) faction,[30] who has been described as "Russia's second-most powerful person" after Putin.[31]
In 2011, on behalf of ExxonMobil, Tillerson signed an agreement with Russia for drilling in the Arctic that could be valued up to $300 billion.[32] The Rosneft deal also gave the state-owned oil company a 30% stake in Exxon owned assets in the U.S. Gulf of Mexico, Canada, and West Texas.[33] The company began drilling in the Kara Sea in the summer of 2014, and a round of sanctions against Russia introduced in September that year due to the Ukrainian crisis was to have brought the project to a halt in mid-September.[34][35] Nevertheless, the company was granted a reprieve that stretched the window to work until October 10, which enabled it to discover a major field with about 750 million barrels of new oil for Russia.[36] In July 2017, the U.S. Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control fined ExxonMobil $2 million for violating sanctions in its dealings with Sechin, leading the company to sue the government.[37][38]
In 2013, Tillerson was awarded the Order of Friendship by Putin for his contribution to developing cooperation in the energy sector.[39][40]
In June 2017, Tillerson announced that Donald Trump had asked him to "stabilize the relationship and build trust."[41]
Compensation[edit]
In 2012, Tillerson's compensation package was $40.5 million.[42] It was $28.1 million in 2013, $33.1 million in 2014, and $27.2 million in 2015.[43] In late 2016, Tillerson held $54 million of Exxon stock, and had a right to deferred stock worth approximately $180 million over the next 10 years.[44]
On January 3, 2017, ExxonMobil announced they had reached an agreement with Tillerson "to sever all ties with the company to comply with conflict-of-interest requirements associated with his nomination as secretary of state."[45]
Wayne Tracker alias[edit]
While CEO of ExxonMobil, Tillerson used an alias email address—"Wayne Tracker"— for eight years and sent thousands of messages.[46] In response to a subpoena issued by the New York State Attorney General's Office (part of a state investigation into whether Exxon had misled investors and the public about climate change), Exxon produced about 60 emails associated with the "Wayne Tracker" account, but did not inform investigators that they were Tillerson's.[47] ExxonMobil stated that the account was "used for everyday business" needs such as "secure and expedited communications" between Tillerson and top company executives.[47][46]
Tillerson's use of the alias became publicly known in March 2017, after New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman wrote in a letter to a judge that Tillerson had used the email for at least seven years.[47] Later that month, Exxon revealed that emails from the "Wayne Tracker" account from September 2014 to September 2015 were missing; a further search recovered some emails, but none between September 5, 2014, and November 28, 2014. An attorney for Exxon said that a "unique issue" limited to that account led to emails being automatically deleted.[48][49]
Other affiliations[edit]
Tillerson is a trustee of the Center for Strategic and International Studies and the American Petroleum Institute.[50] He is also a member of the Business Roundtable.[2] In 2013 he became a member of the National Academy of Engineering.[51] He was a member of the executive committee of The Business Council for 2011 and 2012.[52]
Tillerson is a longtime volunteer with the Boy Scouts of America (BSA), and from 2010 to 2012 was their national president, its highest non-executive position.[53][54] Tillerson is a Distinguished Eagle Scout, and his father was a BSA executive. Tillerson is a long-time supporter of the BSA and has said, "I think the highlight of my youth and adolescent years were my achievements in Scouting." In 2009, Tillerson was inducted into the Eagle Scout Hall of Fame of the Greater New York Councils.[55] Ray L. Hunt, a close friend and the Chairman of Hunt Consolidated, told the Dallas Morning News, "To understand Rex Tillerson, you need to understand Scouting."[54]
After the end of his term as BSA president, he remained on the organization's National Executive Board. There he played a significant role in the board's 2013 decision to rescind the long-standing ban on openly gay youth as members. According to Center for Strategic and International Studies president John Hamre, Tillerson was instrumental in the change and "a key leader in helping the group come to a consensus."[54][56]
On July 9, 2017, Tillerson received the Dewhurst Award from the World Petroleum Council in recognition for "outstanding contribution to the oil and gas industry" during his 41 years at Exxon Mobil.[57]
Political involvement[edit]




Tillerson greets German Foreign Minister Sigmar Gabriel, Washington, D.C., February 2, 2017


Political views[edit]
Russia and Saudi Arabia[edit]
In 2014, Tillerson expressed opposition to the sanctions against Russia in response to the annexation of Crimea at an Exxon shareholder meeting.[58] He told the meeting "We do not support sanctions, generally, because we don't find them to be effective unless they are very well implemented comprehensively and that's a very hard thing to do."[59] In 2016, Tillerson said that the US should have deployed military units to neighboring states next to Russia in a more "muscular" response.[60][61] In 2017, Tillerson said that Russia's annexation of Crimea was illegal.[62] He also compared China's controversial island-building in the South China Sea to Russia's annexation of Crimea.[63]




Tillerson and Saudi Foreign Minister Adel al-Jubeir, Washington, D.C., March 23, 2017


During his Secretary of State confirmation hearings, Marco Rubio asked Tillerson if he would label Saudi Arabia as a "human rights violator." Tillerson declined to do so, saying: "When you designate someone or label someone, is that the most effective way to have progress be able to be made in Saudi Arabia or any other country?"[64] He supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen.[65]
Climate change and carbon tax[edit]
Tillerson announced in 2009 that ExxonMobil favored a carbon tax as "the most efficient means of reflecting the cost of carbon in all economic decisions—from investments made by companies to fuel their requirements to the product choices made by consumers."[66] In October 2016, less than two months before his nomination as Secretary of State, he reaffirmed that ExxonMobil believed a carbon tax would be “the best policy of those being considered. Replacing the hodge-podge of current, largely ineffective regulations with a revenue-neutral carbon tax would ensure a uniform and predictable cost of carbon across the economy ... allow market forces to drive solutions ... maximize transparency, reduce administrative complexity, promote global participation and easily adjust" to new knowledge in climate science and in the policy consequences of various courses of action.[67]
An article in The New York Times suggested that ExxonMobil's embrace of a carbon tax in October 2009 may have simply been an effort to avoid cap and trade legislation that was then being considered by the U.S. Congress as an alternative method of carbon pricing.[68] A Time magazine article in December 2016 asserted that since Tillerson announced his company's preference for a carbon tax, ExxonMobil "has not made a carbon tax a focus of its massive lobbying efforts and has supported a number of candidates and organizations that oppose measures to tackle the [climate change] issue."[69]
In 2010, Tillerson said that while he acknowledged that humans were affecting the climate through greenhouse gas emissions to some degree, it was not yet clear "to what extent and therefore what can you do about it."[70][71]
In 2016, Tillerson stated, "The world is going to have to continue using fossil fuels, whether they like it or not."[72]
Support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP)[edit]




Tillerson, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida and South Korean Foreign Minister Yun Byung-se, February 16, 2017


In 2013, Tillerson outlined his support for the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), stating at the Global Security Forum: "One of the most promising developments on this front is the ongoing effort for the Trans-Pacific Partnership ... The 11 nations that have been working to lower trade barriers and end protectionist policies under this partnership are a diverse mix of developed and developing economies. But all of them understand the value of open markets to growth and progress for every nation."[73]




Tillerson with China's President Xi Jinping before their bilateral meeting in Beijing, March 19, 2017


Free trade[edit]
Speaking in March 2007 at a Council on Foreign Relations event, Tillerson said:

Should the United States seek so-called energy independence in an elusive effort to insulate this country from the impact of world events on the economy, or should Americans pursue the path of international engagement, seeking ways to better compete within the global market for energy? Like the Council's founders, I believe we must choose the course of greater international engagement ... The central reality is this: The global free market for energy provides the most effective means of achieving U.S. energy security by promoting resource development, enabling diversification, multiplying our supply channels, encouraging efficiency, and spurring innovation.[74]

Government regulation[edit]
In 2012 in an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Tillerson expressed his impatience with government regulation, stating "there are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country."[75]
Education[edit]
In September 2013, Tillerson wrote an op-ed piece in The Wall Street Journal defending Common Core.[76]
Republican campaign fundraising and donations[edit]
According to the Center for Responsive Politics, Tillerson has made tens of thousands of dollars of political donations to Republican groups and candidates.[77] According to FEC records, he gave a total of $468,970 in contributions to Republican candidates and committees from 2000 to 2016.[78]
He has contributed to the political campaigns of George W. Bush,[77] as well as Mitt Romney in 2012, and Mitch McConnell.[79] He did not donate to Donald Trump's campaign.[77] He donated to Jeb Bush's campaign during the 2016 Republican primaries.[77][80]
Secretary of State[edit]
Nomination and confirmation[edit]




Tillerson at his confirmation hearing on January 11, 2017






Tillerson being sworn in as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017






Tillerson delivering welcome remarks at the State Department on his first official day as Secretary of State


Tillerson was first recommended to Trump for the Secretary of State role by former Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice, during her meeting with Trump in late November 2016.[81] Rice's recommendation of Tillerson to Trump was backed up by Robert Gates, three days later.[81] Media speculation that he was being considered for the position began on December 5, 2016.[82] On December 9, transition officials reported that Tillerson was the top candidate for the position, surpassing Mitt Romney and David Petraeus.[83] His nomination was reportedly advocated by Steve Bannon and Jared Kushner.[84]
On the evening of December 10, the BBC cited NBC reports that "sources close to Mr Trump [were] ... saying that Mr Tillerson is likely to be named next week" as US Secretary of State. There were also reports that former UN ambassador John Bolton would serve as Deputy Secretary of State, however Bolton was not chosen for this position.[85] On December 12, The New York Times reported that Tillerson had been chosen as Secretary of State.[86] On December 13, 2016, President-elect Donald Trump announced that Tillerson would be his nominee for Secretary of State.[86][87] On January 20, 2017, shortly after being sworn in as President of the United States, Trump formally sent his nomination of Tillerson as Secretary of State to the United States Senate.[88]
In response to Tillerson's comments on blocking access to man-made islands in the South China Sea, China's state-controlled media warned of a "large-scale war" between the U.S. and China.[63][89]
The Senate Foreign Relations Committee approved Tillerson's nomination 11–10, a strict party line vote on January 23, 2017.[90]
The Senate confirmed Tillerson as Secretary of State on February 1, 2017. The Senate voted 56 to 43, with all 52 Republicans in support of his nomination as well as 3 Democrats and 1 independent.[91] He was sworn in the same day.[92]


Confirmation Process


Voting Body
Vote Date
Vote Results


Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
January 23, 2017
11–10


Full Senate
February 1, 2017
56–43


Tenure[edit]
On February 15, 2017, Tillerson embarked on his first overseas trip as Secretary of State to Bonn, Germany, meeting with foreign ministers from the G20.[93][94] In Bonn, Tillerson had meetings with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson,[95] as well as his counterparts from Italy, Turkey, Saudi Arabia, Oman, and the United Arab Emirates.[96][97] Tillerson urged Russia to withdraw from eastern Ukraine, stating that "the United States will consider working with Russia when we can find areas of practical cooperation that will benefit the American people. Where we do not see eye to eye, the United States will stand up for the interests and values of America and her allies. As we search for new common ground, we expect Russia to honor its commitment to the Minsk agreements and work to de-escalate the violence in Ukraine." Tillerson also reaffirmed U.S. commitment to defending South Korea and Japan.[98]




Tillerson with Turkish President Erdoğan at the Presidential Complex in Ankara, March 30, 2017


Tillerson made his first visit to Mexico on February 23, 2017, traveling with Secretary of Homeland Security John F. Kelly. When meeting with Mexico's Secretary of Foreign Affairs Luis Videgaray Caso, Tillerson acknowledged differences between the U.S. and Mexico on views of border security, but also acknowledged the need for cooperation in addressing migration, as well as arms trafficking.[99][100] Tillerson recused himself from TransCanada's application for a presidential permit for the proposed Keystone XL pipeline.[101]




Rex Tillerson with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu


In mid-March 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Asia, traveling to Japan, South Korea, and China.[102][103] Tillerson remarked that diplomatic efforts in the past 20 years to stop North Korea's nuclear development had "failed." Tillerson also stated the United States may need to take preemptive action, remarking "Certainly, we do not want things to get to a military conflict ... but obviously, if North Korea takes actions that threatens the South Korean forces or our own forces, then that would be met with an appropriate response. If they elevate the threat of their weapons program to a level that we believe that requires action, that option is on the table."[104][105]
On March 30, 2017, Tillerson met with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan. Turkey has criticized the United States over its support for Syria’s Kurds.[106] In May, non-violent protestors and Erdoğan's bodyguards clashed outside of the Turkish Ambassador's Residence in Washington, D.C. Tillerson said that the incident was "outrageous" and that the Trump administration has expressed "dismay" over it. He said the administration will await the outcome of an investigation before taking further action.[107]
In mid-April 2017, Tillerson made his first trip to Russia as Secretary of State, meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and President Vladimir Putin. At a news conference, Tillerson remarked that US-Russian relations were at a "low point."[108][109] Tillerson also warned Russia of the risk of "becoming irrelevant in the Middle East" by continuing to support Syrian President Bashar al-Assad.[110]
In May 2017, Tillerson joined President Trump on the President's first overseas trip, with the first destination being Saudi Arabia.[111] While in Saudi Arabia, Tillerson held a joint press conference with Saudi Arabian Foreign Minister Adel bin Ahmed Al-Jubeir.[112]
Tillerson selected Margaret Peterlin to be his chief of staff.[113][114] Politico reported that Tillerson relies strongly on Peterlin and his chief of policy, Brian Hook.[115]
Personal life[edit]




Tillerson and Renda St. Clair in February 2017


Rex Tillerson married twice. He divorced his first wife with whom he has twin boys.[13][116] In 1986 Tillerson married Renda St. Clair, who has a son from her previous marriage.[116] Tillerson also has a son, born in 1988, with St. Clair.[116][117] Tillerson's twin sons are engineers and hold their bachelor's degrees from the Cockrell School of Engineering at the University of Texas at Austin.[13][51] In 2006, Tillerson was named a Distinguished Engineering Graduate.[16]
Tillerson resides in Bartonville, Texas.[118] Following his appointment as Secretary of State, Tillerson bought a home in Kalorama, Washington D.C.[119]
He is a Congregationalist who holds a membership in the National Association of Congregational Christian Churches, a mainline Reformed denomination.[120][121] He and his wife donated between $5,000 and $10,000 to the denomination's The Congregationalist Magazine in 2012.[122][123]
On February 20, 2014, news outlets reported that Tillerson and his wife joined opponents of a proposed water tower that could lead to fracking-related traffic near their homes. Plaintiffs included former U.S. House of Representatives Majority Leader Dick Armey and his wife.[124][125] The Tillersons dropped out of the lawsuit after a judge dismissed their claim in November 2014.[126]
In 2015, Tillerson was named as the 25th most powerful person in the world by Forbes.[12]
See also[edit]

List of Secretaries of State of the United States
List of foreign ministers in 2017
List of current foreign ministers

References[edit]


^ "PN25 - Nomination of Rex W. Tillerson for Department of State". U.S. Congress. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e f "Archive of ExxonMobil Biography of Rex W. Tillerson, Chairman and CEO". ExxonMobil Corporation. Archived from the original on August 23, 2016. Retrieved January 25, 2017. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ Schaefer, Steve (May 25, 2016). "The World's Largest Companies 2016". Forbes. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to Retire, Darren Woods Elected Chairman, CEO of ExxonMobil Corporation". ExxonMobil Corporation. December 14, 2016. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Plumer, Brad (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson's potentially huge conflict of interest over Russia and oil, explained". Vox. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ a b Scheck, Justin; Marson, James; Gold, Russell (December 13, 2015). "Global Deals That Made Exxon's CEO Now Pose Big Test". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ Harding, Luke; Munzinger, Hannes (December 18, 2016). "Leak reveals Rex Tillerson was director of Bahamas-based US-Russian oil firm" – via The Guardian. 
^ "Texas Birth Index, 1903–1997". FamilySearch Database. December 5, 2014. Retrieved December 15, 2016. 
^ Nahal Toosi (January 11, 2017). "Who is Rex Tillerson?". Politico. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b The Alcalde. Emmis Communications. November 2007. p. 47. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ a b Debbie Lord (January 11, 2017). "Read Rex Tillerson's opening statement during the Senate confirmation hearing". Palm Beach Post. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "Tillerson's sister says he would do 'an incredible job'". Abilene Reporter News. December 13, 2016. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b c d e Cody Stark (December 23, 2016). "Huntsville High School graduate Rex Tillerson: 'An All-American kid'". The Huntsville. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Kirdahy, Matthew (September 4, 2007). "Teaching Leadership: Scouts Honor". Forbes. Retrieved September 5, 2007. 
^ a b Glenn Hunter (December 11, 2016). "Why Rex Tillerson, Down-to-Earth Texan, Might Make a Good Secretary of State". D Magazine. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ a b "2006 Distinguished Engineering Graduate: Rex W. Tillerson, B.S.C.E. 1975, Chairman and CEO, ExxonMobil Corporation". Cockrell School of Engineering, University of Texas. 
^ a b Barnhill, Ted. "Distinguishing Features: The Distinguished Alumni of 2007". The Alcalde. Texas Exes. Retrieved January 22, 2012. 
^ Steve Coll (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, from a Corporate Oil Sovereign to the State Department". The New Yorker. Retrieved April 1, 2017. 
^ David Koenig (February 27, 2004). "Exxon Mobil Names Heir Apparent for CEO". Washington Post. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Carola Hoyos; Dan Roberts (August 5, 2005). "Seamless transition to the top for the new 'Mr Exxon'". Financial Times. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ "What Exxon's Rex Tillerson might mean as secretary of state". Al-Monitor. December 13, 2016.
^ Dorell, Oren (9 January 2017). "ExxonMobil and Iran did business under secretary of State nominee Tillerson". USA TODAY. 
^ Corkery, Michael (December 14, 2009). "King Rex Tillerson's Legacy Rides on the XTO Deal". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 26, 2010. 
^ Crooks, Ed (January 4, 2017). "Tillerson set for $180m payout if confirmed as secretary of state". The Financial Times. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ "Remarks of the Office of Government Ethics Director" (PDF) – via DocumentCloud. 
^ "Remarks of Walter M. Shaub, Jr., Director, U.S. Office of Government Ethics, as prepared for delivery at 4:00 p.m. on January 11, 2017, at the Brookings Institution" (PDF). The Brookings Institution. January 11, 2017. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ a b Bradley Olson, Rex Tillerson, a Candidate for Secretary of State, Has Ties to Vladimir Putin, The Wall Street Journal, December 6, 2016.
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Ioffe, Julia (December 10, 2016). "What It Really Means to Be a 'Friend of Putin'". Politico Magazine. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Hahn, Gordon (July 21, 2008). "The Siloviki Downgraded. In Russia's New Configuration of Power". Archived from the original on December 31, 2010. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Peleschuk, Dan. "Think it's just Putin who runs Russia? Guess again". CNBC. Archived from the original on December 25, 2014. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Trefgarne, George (August 31, 2011). "Vladimir Putin plays for high stakes in the oil game". The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on October 24, 2014. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Mahanta, Siddhartha. "A Brief Guide to Rex Tillerson's Controversial Foreign Ties". The Atlantic. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Reed, Stanley & Clifford Krauss (September 12, 2014). "New Sanctions to Stall Exxon's Arctic Oil Plans", The New York Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ Williams, Cara (September 19, 2014) "ExxonMobil said to halt drilling in $700-million project in Russia", Los Angeles Times. Retrieved December 10, 2016.
^ "Rex Tillerson's Company, Exxon, Has Billions at Stake Over Sanctions on Russia". The New York Times. December 12, 2016. Retrieved December 12, 2016. 
^ Paletta, Damian; Morello, Carol (21 July 2017). "The strange legal battle that is pitting Trump’s secretaries of the Treasury and State against each other". The Washington Post. p. A1. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "The U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control Assesses a Civil Monetary Penalty Against ExxonMobil Corporation". www.treasury.gov (Press release). 20 July 2017. Retrieved 21 July 2017. 
^ "Meeting with energy company heads". Kremlin. June 21, 2013. 
^ "Rex Tillerson - the wild card diplomat". BBC News. February 1, 2017. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ AP, Nick Perry /. "Tillerson Says Trump Asked Him to Re-Engage Russia". Time. Retrieved 2017-07-02. 
^ Creamer, Robert (February 4, 2014). "The Blog: Jamie Dimon's Big Pay Raise – and the Minimum Wage". The Huffington Post. Retrieved February 11, 2014. 
^ Mufson, Steve (April 29, 2016). "Profits are down at ExxonMobil, but don't cry for CEO Rex Tillerson". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Neate, Rupert (December 17, 2016). "Donald Trump faces Senate backlash over 'cabinet of billionaires'". The Guardian. 
^ "ExxonMobil, Tillerson Reach Agreement to Comply with Conflict of Interest Requirements" (Press release). Exxon Mobil. January 3, 2017. 
^ a b Scheyder, Ernest (March 14, 2017). "Tillerson's email alias was prompted by business needs, Exxon says". Reuters. Retrieved 20 March 2017. 
^ a b c Rex Tillerson 'used email alias' at Exxon to talk climate change, BBC News (March 15, 2017).
^ "In the Matter of the Application of the People of the State of New York, by Eric T. Schneiderman, Index No. 451962/2016". New York State Unified Court System. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ Berke, Jeremy. "Exxon admits it lost up to a year's worth of Rex Tillerson's 'Wayne Tracker' emails". Business Insider. Retrieved 23 March 2017. 
^ "Rex W. Tillerson – Center for Strategic and International Studies". csis.org. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ a b "Tillerson Family Commits $5 Million to Cockrell School of Engineering, Bolsters Engineering Education and Research Center". University of Texas. April 15, 2014. Retrieved 2 April 2017. 
^ "The Business Council: Executive Committee 2011–2012". The Business Council. Archived from the original on July 22, 2012. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "CEO of Exxon Mobil Named National Boy Scouts of America President". scoutingnews.org. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ a b c James, Osbourne (September 1, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO Rex Tillerson an Eagle Scout to the core". Dallas News. 
^ Boy Scouts of America (October 28, 2009). "Boy Scouts Inducts Rex Tillerson, Chairman and CEO of ExxonMobil, Into Eagle Scout Hall of Fame". Boy Scouts of America (Press release). 
^ Krauss, Clifford (December 11, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, an Aggressive Dealmaker Whose Ties With Russia May Prompt Scrutiny". The New York Times. 
^ "Rex Tillerson to receive WPC Dewhurst Award". World Petroleum Council. Retrieved 10 July 2017. 
^ "Subscribe to read". Financial Times. 
^ "How Exxon CEO Tillerson feels about sanctions (and other Secretary-related matters)". Biz Journals. December 6, 2016. 
^ Matthew Lee (January 12, 2017). "Trump's pick for top diplomat takes tough line on Moscow". Yahoo. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson: U.S. response to Russia Crimea seizure was 'weak'". Washington Times. January 11, 2017. Retrieved January 25, 2017. 
^ "Rex Tillerson takes tough line on Russian hacking in tense hearing". The Washington Times. January 11, 2017.
^ a b "South China Sea: China media warn US over 'confrontation'". BBC News. 13 January 2017.
^ "Tillerson won't label Saudi Arabia a human rights violator". The Washington Post. January 11, 2017.
^ "Rex Tillerson Wants to Provide Saudi Arabia With More Help to Bomb Yemen". The Intercept. January 12, 2017.
^ "ExxonMobil and the carbon tax". ExxonMobil.com. December 2, 2015. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (October 19, 2016). The Path Forward in Today's Energy Environment (Speech). 37th Annual Oil and Money Conference. London, England. Retrieved December 23, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (December 28, 2016). "Tillerson Led Exxon's Shift on Climate Change; Some Say 'It Was All P.R.'". The New York Times. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ Worland, Justin (December 14, 2016). "What Rex Tillerson as Secretary of State Would Mean for Climate Change". Time. Retrieved December 30, 2016. 
^ "THE EXXONMOBIL-XTO MERGER: IMPACT ON U.S. ENERGY MARKETS" (PDF). Gpo.gov. Retrieved December 11, 2016. 
^ Schwartz, John (August 19, 2016). "Exxon Mobil Fraud Inquiry Said to Focus More on Future Than Past". The New York Times. Retrieved August 23, 2016. 
^ Schlanger, Zoe (May 26, 2016). "Is Exxon Waiting for the Paris Climate Agreement to Fail?". Newsweek. 
^ Betsy Woodruff, "Trump's Secretary of State Favorite Rex Tillerson Praised TPP", December 12, 2016, The Daily Beast.
^ Denning, Liam (December 7, 2016). "Mr. Exxon Goes to Washington (Maybe)". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Coll, Steve (April 9, 2012). "Gusher: The Power of ExxonMobil". The New Yorker. 
^ Tillerson, Rex (September 5, 2013). "How to Stop the Drop in American Education". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ a b c d Mitchell, Andrea. "Rex Tillerson of ExxonMobil Expected to Be Named Trump's Secretary of State: Sources". NBC News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ "Rex Tillerson Political Campaign Contributions". Campaign Money. Retrieved 25 January 2017. 
^ "Where CEO political dollars go – Rex Tillerson (2)". Fortune. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ Lavelle, Marianne (July 22, 2016). "Fossil Fuel Money Still a Dry Well for Trump Campaign". InsideClimate News. Retrieved December 10, 2016. 
^ a b ExxonMobil CEO Tillerson emerging as frontrunner for secretary of state Henry C. Jackson, Josh Dawsey and Eliana Johnson, Politico, December 9, 2016
^ "Exxon CEO Now a Contender for Donald Trump's Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 5, 2016. 
^ "Exxon's Rex Tillerson Is Top Candidate for Secretary of State". The Wall Street Journal. December 9, 2016. 
^ Sanger, David E., Maggie Haberman & Clifford Krauss, "Rex Tillerson, Exxon Chief, Is Expected to Be Pick for Secretary of State", The New York Times, December 10, 2016.
^ "Trump presidency: Exxon's Rex Tillerson for top diplomat?", BBC, December 10, 2016.
^ a b Michael D. Shear and Maggie Haberman (December 12, 2016), "Trump Picks Rex Tillerson, Exxon C.E.O., as Secretary of State", The New York Times CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Pace, Julie; Lucey, Catherine (December 13, 2016). "Donald Trump Picks Exxon Mobil's Rex Tillerson to Lead State Department". Time. Associated Press. Retrieved December 13, 2016. 
^ "Nominations Sent to the Senate". White House. January 20, 2017. Retrieved February 22, 2017. 
^ "China warns of nuclear war". Philippine Daily Inquirer. 14 January 2017.
^ Gaouette, Nicole. "Senate committee approves Tillerson for secretary of state". CNN. 
^ "PN25 Roll call confirmation vote". United States Senate. February 1, 2017. Retrieved February 1, 2017. 
^ "Remarks by President Trump and Vice President Pence at Swearing-In Ceremony for Secretary of State Rex Tillerson". February 1, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 15, 2017). "Tillerson in Germany on his first trip abroad as U.S. secretary of state". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson and Mattis in guarded approach to Russia". BBC News. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Harris, Cardiner (February 16, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Meets Russian Counterpart in First Trip as Top U.S. Diplomat". New York Times. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson arrives in Bonn amid questions over U.S. foreign policy". Reuters. February 15, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Meeting on Yemen". U.S. Department of State. February 16, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ Morello, Carol (February 16, 2017). "Tillerson, in diplomatic debut, urges Russia to pull back in eastern Ukraine". Washington Post. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "As Kelly and Tillerson Visit Mexico, Their Reassurances Differ From Trump's Stance". New York Times. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "Mexican officials tell US: We don't agree". CNN. February 23, 2017. Retrieved February 25, 2017. 
^ "State Dept Response to Greenpeace 9 March 2017.pdf". oge.app.box.com. Retrieved 2017-03-10. 
^ "Secretary of State Tillerson To Travel to Tokyo, Seoul, and Beijing". U.S. Department of State. March 7, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Crowley, Michael (March 15, 2017). "Tillerson's quiet trip to Asia". Politico. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ Sanger, David (March 17, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Rejects Talks With North Korea on Nuclear Program". New York Times. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson on North Korea: Military action is 'an option'". CNN. March 17, 2017. Retrieved March 17, 2017. 
^ "Tillerson tells frustrated Turks: U.S. faces tough choices in Syria". Reuters. March 30, 2017.
^ "Tillerson waits on Turkey embassy brawl; McCain says 'look at the clip'". Fox News. May 21, 2017. Retrieved May 22, 2017. 
^ "Putin meets with Tillerson in Russia as Syria rift deepens". CNN. April 12, 2017. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Finnegan, Conor (April 12, 2017). "Tillerson says 'US-Russia relations at a low point' after meeting with Putin". ABC News. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ Harris, Gardiner (April 11, 2017). "Tillerson Warns Russia on Syria, Saying Assad Era Is 'Coming to an End'". New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2017. 
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-gets-elaborate-welcome-in-saudi-arabia-embarking-on-first-foreign-trip/2017/05/20/679f2766-3d1d-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html
^ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rn0xaUZBCVg
^ "Chief of Staff: Margaret Peterlin". U.S. Department of State. Retrieved April 14, 2017. 
^ Wadhams, Nick (May 31, 2017). "Tillerson’s Enigmatic Chief of Staff Wields Power, Not the Spotlight". Bloomberg News. Archived from the original on May 31, 2017. 
^ Johnson, Eliana; Crowley, Michael (4 June 2017). "The bottleneck in Rex Tillerson’s State Department". POLITICO. Retrieved 4 June 2017. 
^ a b c Steve Coll (May 1, 2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin Publishing Group. p. 137. ISBN 978-1-101-57214-6. Retrieved April 2, 2017. 
^ Cordon, Matthew C. "Rex W. Tillerson biography". Encyclopedia of Business, 2nd ed. Retrieved January 23, 2012. 
^ Candy Evans (December 16, 2016). "Rex Tillerson Bought the Late Charles Wyly's Equestrian Ranch in Argyle: Horse Country Just Got Hotter". CandysDirt.com. Retrieved March 29, 2017. 
^ Benjamin Freed (February 22, 2017). "Rex Tillerson Buys $5.6 Million Kalorama Home". Washingtonian. Retrieved April 21, 2017. 
^ Silk, Mark (December 14, 2016). "Rex Tillerson, Establishment Protestant secretary of state". Religious News Service. Retrieved February 2, 2017. 
^ Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. p. 569 – via Google Books. 
^ "Honor Roll of Distinguished Individual Donors" (PDF). The Congregationalist. 165 (3): 7. September 2013. 
^ "Donations". The Congregationalist. Retrieved February 3, 2017. 
^ Richter, Marice (February 26, 2014). "Exxon Mobil CEO welcomes fracking, but not water tower in his backyard". Reuters. 
^ Gilbert, Daniel (February 20, 2014). "Exxon CEO Joins Suit Citing Fracking Concerns". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ Sakelaris, Nicholas (April 21, 2014). "Rex Tillerson drops out of water tower lawsuit in Bartonville". Dallas Business Journal. Retrieved November 28, 2014. 


Further reading[edit]

Coll, Steve (2012). Private Empire: ExxonMobil and American Power. Penguin. ISBN 978-1-59420-335-0. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rex Tillerson.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Rex Tillerson



Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
Rex Tillerson at Forbes
Appearances on C-SPAN



Business positions


Preceded by
Lee Raymond
Chief Executive Officer of ExxonMobil
2006–2016
Succeeded by
Darren Woods


Boy Scouts of America


Preceded by
John Gottschalk
President of the Boy Scouts of America
2010–2012
Succeeded by
Wayne M. Perry


Political offices


Preceded by
John Kerry
United States Secretary of State
2017–present
Incumbent


Current U.S. order of precedence (ceremonial)


Preceded by
Ambassadors from the United States
(while at their posts)
Order of Precedence of the United States
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Ambassadors to the United States
(in order of tenure)


Preceded by
Otherwise Barack Obama
as Former President
Succeeded by
Otherwise António Guterres
as Secretary-General of the United Nations


Current U.S. presidential line of succession


Preceded by
Orrin Hatch
as President pro tempore of the Senate
4th in line
as Secretary of State
Succeeded by
Steve Mnuchin
as Secretary of the Treasury








v
t
e


United States Secretaries of State



Secretary of Foreign Affairs
1781–89



R. Livingston
Jay








Secretary of State
1789–present



Jefferson
Randolph
Pickering
J. Marshall
Madison
Smith
Monroe
Adams
Clay
Van Buren
E. Livingston
McLane
Forsyth
Webster
Upshur
Calhoun
Buchanan
Clayton
Webster
Everett
Marcy
Cass
Black
Seward
Washburne
Fish
Evarts
Blaine
Frelinghuysen
Bayard
Blaine
Foster
Gresham
Olney
Sherman
Day
Hay
Root
Bacon
Knox
Bryan
Lansing
Colby
Hughes
Kellogg
Stimson
Hull
Stettinius
Byrnes
G. Marshall
Acheson
Dulles
Herter
Rusk
Rogers
Kissinger
Vance
Muskie
Haig
Shultz
Baker
Eagleburger
Christopher
Albright
Powell
Rice (tenure)
Clinton (tenure)
Kerry (tenure)
Tillerson












v
t
e


Foreign Ministers of UNSC Permanent Members






 Wang
 Le Drian
 Lavrov
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Group of 8






 Freeland
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Alfano
 Kishida
 Lavrov (Suspended)
 Johnson
 Tillerson
 Mogherini












v
t
e


Current foreign ministers of the G20






 Malcorra
 Bishop
 Nunes
 Freeland
 Wang
 Mogherini
 Le Drian
 Gabriel
 Swaraj
 Marsudi




 Alfano
 Kishida
 Videgaray
 Lavrov
 al-Jubeir
 Mashabane
 Kang
 Çavuşoğlu
 Johnson
 Tillerson












v
t
e


Current Foreign Ministers of the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation






 Bishop
 Bolkiah
 Freeland
 Muñoz
  Wang
 Marsudi
 Kishida
 Kang
 Anifah
 Videgaray
 Brownlee
 Pato




 Luna
 Cayetano
 Lavrov
 Balakrishnan
 Lee
 Pramudwinai
 Tillerson
 Minh












v
t
e


Quartet on the Middle East



Negotiating parties



 Israel
 Palestinian Authority





Diplomatic quartet



 European Union (Mogherini)
 Russia (Lavrov)
 United Nations (Guterres)
 United States (Tillerson)





Special Envoy



 Tony Blair





Associated organizations



Elections Reform Support Group












v
t
e


Current members of the Cabinet of the United States






Trump
Pence











Acosta
Carson
Chao
Coatsc
DeVos
Haleyc
Kelly
Lighthizerc
Mattis
McMahonc
Mnuchin
Mulvaneyc
Perdue
Perry
Pompeoc
Price
Priebusc
Pruittc
Ross
Sessions
Shulkin
Tillerson
Zinke






a acting; c cabinet-level










v
t
e


Cabinet of President Donald Trump (2017–present)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Rex Tillerson (2017–present)








Secretary of the Treasury



Steven Mnuchin (2017–present)





Secretary of Defense



James Mattis (2017–present)





Attorney General



Jeff Sessions (2017–present)





Secretary of the Interior



Ryan Zinke (2017–present)





Secretary of Agriculture



Sonny Perdue (2017–present)





Secretary of Commerce



Wilbur Ross (2017–present)





Secretary of Labor



Alex Acosta (2017–present)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Tom Price (2017–present)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Ben Carson (2017–present)





Secretary of Transportation



Elaine Chao (2017–present)





Secretary of Energy



Rick Perry (2017–present)





Secretary of Education



Betsy DeVos (2017–present)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



David Shulkin (2017–present)





Secretary of Homeland Security



John Kelly (2017–present)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Mike Pence (2017–present)








White House Chief of Staff



Reince Priebus (2017–present)





Trade Representative



Robert Lighthizer (2017–present)





Director of National Intelligence



Dan Coats (2017–present)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Nikki Haley (2017–present)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Mick Mulvaney (2017–present)





Director of the Central Intelligence Agency



Mike Pompeo (2017–present)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Scott Pruitt (2017–present)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Linda McMahon (2017–present)









See also: Political appointments of Donald Trump










v
t
e


Presidential line of succession in the United States of America






Vice President (Mike Pence)
Speaker of the House of Representatives (Paul Ryan)
President pro tempore of the Senate (Orrin Hatch)
Secretary of State (Rex Tillerson)
Secretary of the Treasury (Steven Mnuchin)
Secretary of Defense (James Mattis)
Attorney General (Jeff Sessions)
Secretary of the Interior (Ryan Zinke)
Secretary of Agriculture (Sonny Perdue)
Secretary of Commerce (Wilbur Ross)
Secretary of Labor (Alex Acosta)
Secretary of Health and Human Services (Tom Price)
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development (Ben Carson)
Secretary of Transportation (Elaine Chao[a])
Secretary of Energy (Rick Perry)
Secretary of Education (Betsy DeVos)
Secretary of Veterans Affairs (David Shulkin)
Secretary of Homeland Security (John F. Kelly)










^ Although Elaine Chao is the current Secretary of Transportation, she is not a natural-born citizen (acquired U.S. citizenship by naturalization) and thus ineligible for the Presidency.














v
t
e


ExxonMobil



Divisions



Aera Energy
Esso
Esso Australia
Exxon
Exxon Neftegas
Humble Oil
Imperial Oil
Magnolia Petroleum Company
Mobil
Mobil Producing Nigeria
Petron
SeaRiver Maritime
Superior Oil Company
Syncrude
Vacuum Oil Company
XTO Energy





People



Michael Boskin
Larry R. Faulkner
William W. George
James R. Houghton
Samuel J. Palmisano
Lee R. Raymond
John D. Rockefeller
Walter V. Shipley
Walter C. Teagle
Rex Tillerson





Facilities



Baton Rouge Refinery
Baytown Refinery
Milford Haven
Exxon Building (New York)
Fawley Refinery
Imperial Oil Building
Mossmorran
Nanticoke Refinery





Controversies



Accusations of ExxonMobil human rights violations in Indonesia
Allison v. ExxonMobil Corp.
Exxon Corp. v Exxon Insurance Consultants International Ltd
ExxonMobil climate change controversy
Kivalina v. ExxonMobil Corporation
Oil Pollution Act of 1990





Oil spills



2010 ExxonMobil oil spill
2010 Port Arthur oil spill
2013 Mayflower oil spill
Exxon Valdez oil spill
Greenpoint oil spill
SS Atlantic Empress
SS Esso Brussels





Brands



Coolanol
Enco
Hefty
Mobil 1
On the Run
Speedpass





Oil and gas fields



Colony Shale Oil Project
East-Prinovozemelsky field
Goose Creek Oil Field
Kearl Oil Sands Project
Kizomba deepwater project
Ormen Lange
Pembina oil field
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Sable Offshore Energy Project
Sakhalin-I
Tengiz Field
Tern oilfield
Tuapse field
West Qurna Field





Other



ExxonMobil Electrofrac
Mobil Showcase Network
Save the Tiger Fund










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rex_Tillerson&oldid=791605345"					
Categories: 1952 birthsAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican chairmen of corporationsAmerican chief executives of energy companiesAmerican chief executives of Fortune 500 companiesAmerican ChristiansAmerican civil engineersAmerican diplomatsBusinesspeople from TexasExxonMobil peopleDirectors of ExxonMobilDistinguished Eagle ScoutsLiving peopleMembers of the United States National Academy of EngineeringNational Executive Board of the Boy Scouts of America membersPeople from Wichita Falls, TexasPetroleum politicsRecipients of the Order of FriendshipTexas RepublicansTrump administration cabinet membersUnited States Secretaries of StateUniversity of Texas at Austin alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 maint: Uses authors parameterUse mdy dates from December 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


አማርኛالعربيةAzərbaycancaتۆرکجهБеларускаяCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենBahasa IndonesiaInterlingueItalianoעבריתქართულიLatinaLatviešuLumbaartMagyarमराठीمصرىBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaТатарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việtייִדיש中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 09:49.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 
















Rex Tillerson - Biography - IMDb












































































 
    










 
IMDb




More





All
Titles
TV Episodes
Names
Companies
Keywords
Characters
Quotes
Bios
Plots










Movies,
                TV
                & Showtimes




MOVIES

In Theaters
Showtimes & Tickets
Latest Trailers
Coming Soon
Release Calendar
Top Rated Movies
Top Rated Indian Movies
Most Popular Movies

CHARTS & TRENDS

Box Office
Oscar Winners
Most Popular by Genre



TV & VIDEO

IMDb TV
On Tonight
Top Rated TV Shows
Most Popular TV Shows
Watch Now on Amazon
DVD & Blu-Ray

SPECIAL FEATURES

Amazon Originals
Streaming
Comic-Con
IMDb Picks
Superheroes







Celebs,
                Events
                & Photos




CELEBS

Born Today
Celebrity News
Most Popular Celebs

PHOTOS

Latest Stills
Latest Posters
Photos We Love



EVENTS

Awards Central
Oscars
Golden Globes
Sundance
Cannes
Comic-Con
Emmy Awards
Venice Film Festival
Toronto Film Festival
Festival Central
Tribeca
All Events







News &
Community





LATEST HEADLINES


 ‘Doctor Who’ Showrunner to Press: ‘Shut the Hell Up’ About Jodie Whittaker Backlash

12 hours ago


 ‘Wonder Woman’ Becomes Top-Grossing Summer Film as Warner Bros. Crosses $1 Billion Domestically

15 hours ago


 ‘Dunkirk’ Claims Box Office Victory With $50.5 Million Opening

19 hours ago





NEWS

Top News
Movie News
TV News
Celebrity News
Indie News

COMMUNITY

Contributor Zone
Polls







Watchlist




            YOUR WATCHLIST
    













 
 


 



The leading information resource for the entertainment industry
Find industry contacts & talent representation
Manage your photos, credits, & more
Showcase yourself on IMDb & Amazon
Go to IMDbPro


|

Help


 

 

 










Sign in with Facebook
Other Sign in options










 








 








Edit




Rex Tillerson 


Biography




Showing all 11 items

Jump to:
Overview (4) |
Mini Bio (1) |
Spouse (1) |
Trivia (5)  


Overview (4)

Date of Birth

23 March
1952, Wichita Falls, Texas, USA 


Birth NameRex Wayne Tillerson

Nickname
T-Rex    
Height

5' 10" (1.78 m)    


Mini Bio (1)


          Rex Tillerson was born on March 23, 1952 in Wichita Falls, Texas, USA as Rex Wayne Tillerson. He has been married to Renda St. Clair since June 21, 1986. They have four children.



Spouse (1)


               Renda St. Clair          

(21 June 1986            - 
present) (4 children)          



Trivia (5)

      Is an Eagle Scout and serves on the Boy Scouts of America's National Executive Board.


      Graduated from the University of Texas at Austin, in Austin, Texas in 1975 with a Bachelor of Science degree in civil engineering.


      Is the Chief Executive Officer (CEO) and a chairman of ExxonMobil Corporation.


      Has twin boys with his first wife.


      Secretary of State under President Trump.[April 2017].







See also


Other Works
| 

Publicity Listings
| 

Official Sites
| 

Contact Info






Getting Started
|
Contributor Zone »
Contribute to This Page




Edit page



Add resume










 
    


ad feedback





Rex Tillerson 
Personal Details



Biography




Other Works




Publicity Listings




Official Sites




Contact Info (IMDbPro)





Filmography



by Year




by Job




by Ratings




by Votes




by Genre




by Keyword



Did You Know?



Personal Quotes




Trivia 




Trademark



Photo & Video



Photo Gallery




Trailers and Videos



Opinion



Awards



Related Items



Credited With




NewsDesk




External Sites



Professional Services



Promote yourself with a resume




Add or change photos




Get more at IMDbPro





Explore More
Show Less




Share this page:















Create a list »
                
User Lists
Related lists from IMDb users


 


Snide's Corner



            a list of 3482 people
            created 02 Nov 2013
        
 



 


Celebrity Hate List



            a list of 363 people
            created 13 Oct 2015
        
 



 


Cabinet of the United States



            a list of 23 people
            created 6 months ago
        
 


See all related lists »
                







 






 









 





 






IMDb Everywhere

 

 

 


Find showtimes, watch trailers, browse photos, track your Watchlist and rate your favorite movies and TV shows on your phone or tablet!
IMDb Mobile site




      Follow IMDb on
      
 

 

 









Home
Top Rated Movies
Box Office
TV
Coming Soon
Site Index
Search
In Theaters




Contact Us
 Register

News

Press Room
Advertising
Jobs




IMDbPro
 Box Office Mojo

 Withoutabox


Conditions of Use
Privacy Policy
 Interest-Based Ads










Copyright © 1990-2017
                IMDb.com, Inc.


                An Amazon.com company.
            




                Amazon Affiliates
            





Amazon Video
Watch Movies &TV Online






Prime Video
Unlimited Streamingof Movies & TV






Amazon Germany
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon Italy
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon France
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon India
Buy Movie andTV Show DVDs






DPReview
DigitalPhotography






Audible
DownloadAudio Books








































































































Rex Tillerson Quotes - BrainyQuote



































 Authors:

A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M


N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z



 | 
Follow Us: 















Please enable Javascript
This site requires Javascript be enabled to provide you the best experience. Some features may not be available with
Javascript disabled!

 















Compromise on ethical conduct is not an option.


Rex Tillerson






 
 

 
 
 













Related Authors 


Steve Jobs


Warren Buffett


Henry Ford


Bill Gates


Jim Rohn


Stephen Covey


Peter Drucker


Les Brown




Popular Topics 


Life Quotes


Motivational Quotes


Inspirational Quotes


Friendship Quotes


Love Quotes


Smile Quotes


Positive Quotes


Funny Quotes




More 



Find on Amazon:
Rex Tillerson

Cite this page


About
About Us

Privacy

Terms





Rex Tillerson Quotes

American
-
Businessman

Born: March 23, 1952










































   Loading...






When coal came into the picture, it took about 50 or 60 years to displace timber. Then, crude oil was found, and it took 60, 70 years, and then natural gas. So it takes 100 years or more for some new breakthrough in energy to become the dominant source. Most people have difficulty coming to grips with the sheer enormity of energy consumption.
Rex Tillerson


Energy,
People,
Picture



















Integrity is essential and irreplaceable. It is the most valuable asset for a person, a company, or a society seeking to build and progress.
Rex Tillerson


Integrity,
Progress,
Society
























Experience tells us that a good foundation is critical for success in the Arctic and elsewhere. ExxonMobil's Sakhalin-1 project with Rosneft is an example where we have put this experience to work.
Rex Tillerson


Work,
Success,
Good



















Natural gas obviously brings with it a number of quality-of-life environmental benefits because it is a relatively clean-burning fuel. It has a CO2 footprint, but it has no particulates. It has none of the other emissions elements that are of concern to public health that other forms of power-generation fuels do have: coal, fuel oil, others.
Rex Tillerson


Health,
Environmental,
Oil



















Changes to weather patterns that move crop production areas around - we'll adapt to that. It's an engineering problem, and it has engineering solutions.
Rex Tillerson


Changes,
Weather,
Problem



















Compromise on ethical conduct is not an option.
Rex Tillerson


Compromise,
Ethical,
Conduct



















The Boy Scouts, of course, had an influence on me because I learned about service in the community.
Rex Tillerson


Community,
Service,
Me



















By the year 2040, the world's population is likely to increase by about 2 billion people, with also projected economic output will be up about 130 percent versus the year 2010.
Rex Tillerson


World,
Population,
People



















If you ask the average person on the street about U.S. energy and U.S. oil in particular, our situation, most Americans would say, 'Oh, we're energy poor; we don't have enough oil; we don't have enough natural gas.'
Rex Tillerson


Energy,
You,
Street
























In conventional oil and natural gas production, you always produce a lot of formation water, and it's crummy water. It's real salty. It's got heavy metals in it. It's got bad stuff in it.
Rex Tillerson


Water,
You,
Real



















There are still hundreds of millions, billions of people living in abject poverty around the world. They need electricity. They need electricity they can count on, that they can afford. They need fuel to cook their food on that's not animal dung.
Rex Tillerson


Food,
World,
Animal



















You know, oil prices from 2007, on the strength of a very robust global economy and a very robust emerging China, many of you will recall, ramped up to near $150 a barrel. Then we had the financial - U.S. financial collapse. Oil prices collapsed all the way down to $40 a barrel.
Rex Tillerson


Strength,
Financial,
Know



















None of us live in a zero-risk world.
Rex Tillerson


World,
Live,
Us



















You'd save millions upon millions of lives by making fossil fuels available to parts of the world that don't have it.
Rex Tillerson


World,
You,
Fossil Fuels



















You can be afraid of a lot of things that you don't understand.
Rex Tillerson


You,
Understand,
Afraid
























There are a thousand ways you can be told 'no' in this country.
Rex Tillerson


You,
Country,
Thousand



















In the business world, we can point to instances when a lack of integrity has bankrupted entire companies - in sectors as different as finance, telecommunications, manufacturing, and energy.
Rex Tillerson


Business,
Integrity,
Finance



















Throughout my life and career, I have continually been impressed with the importance of integrity - whether it was growing up as a Boy Scout, working in one of my first jobs as a university janitor, or being a leader in a Fortune 500 company.
Rex Tillerson


Life,
Integrity,
Leader



















I never saw a bureaucracy produce a single barrel of oil.
Rex Tillerson


Single,
Bureaucracy,
Oil



















Because we have a society that by and large is illiterate in these areas - science, math and engineering - what we do is a mystery to them, and they find it scary. And because of that, it creates easy opportunities for opponents of development, activist organizations, to manufacture fear.
Rex Tillerson


Fear,
Science,
Opportunities



















The consequences of a misstep in a well, while large to the immediate people that live around that well, in the great scheme of things are pretty small, and even to the immediate people around the well, they could be mitigated.
Rex Tillerson


Great,
Small,
People



















I'm not disputing that increasing CO2 emissions in the atmosphere is going to have an impact. It'll have a warming impact.
Rex Tillerson


Impact,
Going,
Atmosphere
























We have spent our entire existence adapting.
Rex Tillerson


Existence,
Our,
Spent



















The disciplined approach to pursuing and selecting the most attractive investment opportunities continues to distinguish ExxonMobil. We are long-term driven, and we're patient. And we're not opportunity-constrained.
Rex Tillerson


Opportunities,
Investment



















We are grounded in the reality of the day and grounded in the technology of the day. Just saying 'turn the taps off' is not acceptable to humanity.
Rex Tillerson


Technology,
Day,
Humanity



















When coal came into the picture, it took about 50 or 60 years to displace timber. Then crude oil was found, and it took 60, 70 years, and then natural gas. So it takes 100 years or more for some new breakthrough in energy to become the dominant source.
Rex Tillerson


Energy,
Picture,
100 Years


































Share this page: 






























Cite this Page:
Citation







Find on Amazon:
Rex Tillerson
















Related Authors



Steve Jobs




Warren Buffett




Henry Ford




Bill Gates




Jim Rohn




Stephen Covey




Peter Drucker




Les Brown


































BrainyQuote Desktop
BrainyQuote Mobile













Site

Home
Authors
Topics
Quote Of The Day
Pictures
Top 100 Quotes
Professions
Birthdays




Social
BQ on Facebook
BQ on Twitter
BQ on Pinterest
BQ on Google+
BQ on Instagram


Shop
BrainyQuote Store




Apps
iPhone/iPad app

Quote Of The Day Feeds
Javascript and RSS feeds
WordPress plugin
Quote of the Day Email




About
About Us
Contact Us
Submit
Privacy
Terms









Copyright © 2001 - 2017 BrainyQuote














   Loading...


Load more quotes



